Wow, you're a buzz-kill.
Time to hang out with a different crowd there, 1smartass.  
You can march for me. I'm going to a party and having some fun.
Damn, I'm really sorry about that.  Sometimes there just isn't really anything one can say to make things any better, but my thoughts are with you.
Wait, what?   You're telling me that the defense is that a command window is essentially a DOS compatibility layer?  And that this is so damned hairy that they had to write a separate OS subsystem to handle it?  And that's okay?  I'm not sure what you mean by "glorified telnet."  Wait, let me open up a Terminal here.  This is OS X, but it might as well be Linux or Solaris.  Essentially I'm running bash here.  It's a program.  it doesn't run in any kind of crazy subsystem.  It doesn't require separate security.  It doesn't act as sume kind of emulator or compatibility layer,  It's just a program running in a window. Look, I'm not going to tell anyone what they should or should not like.  So if you like cmd.exe and think that's okay, then rock out. However, I refuse to accept this shit.  I don't use Windows (or MS software at all where I can avoid it) because of decisions like this.  MS decides to make command windows be DOS compatibility layers, which causes side-effects like not being able to theme the window or not being able to drop objects onto it. Then, rather than fix those problems, they tell you that the faults are by design and you can just suck it up and like it.  Yeah, fuck that.
And if you sincerely believe that headline, contact me for the most *amazing* real estate deal of the century!
Not in University City.  All the students are gone.  
Indeed I did, but it was intentional. That clock watching was some good stuff. I've saturated my inner thigh with my man fat.
That has little to do with illegal immigrants. Many crops are being used for corn/ethanol fuels instead of food, and the Australian drought has affected wheat production quite a bit. At least that's what I heard on NPR. :)
Yea, and he probably hasn't been laid in years. Must be a democrat. Only talks about other people getting laid.
I FUCKING HATE DIGG MAN,,,   "IM SORRY YOUR SESSION HAS TIMED OUT" AND OUR WEBSITE EATS DOG SHIT. FUCK DIGG BRO
Your ideas intrigue me and I wish to subscribe to your newsletter.
I knew you were a poor idiot.
YEA WHATEVER BRO YOU IDIOT
What organization? AQ is a bunch of wingnuts who use the AQ in X banner to rally the troops, to scare us, and to sound bigger than they are. There is little evidence that AQ is an actual organization, but much to the contrary.
I have no idea why you're getting downmodded, that's pretty accurate. If you take pollution for instance, free market fails because one company produces the pollution and everybody pays. That's why the state has to step in and regulate to make sure that the polluter pays, to create incentives to reduce the pollution. The whole concept of carbon credits is trying to automate this process and put pollution back on the free market, but my personal opinion is that it's an artificial concept that will fail.  Same with education - if you leave it up to the free market you'll have many people who can't afford it, creating negative consequences for everybody. I hate taxes but I'd rather pay than live in a society of illiterate dimwits.
Ah, yeah that's probably it.  
There's now one in Mexico City. Have a safe trip!
Absolutely.  I've used the same argument to move people from RCS to CVS and from CVS to distributed tools.
They wouldn't be the first willfully ignorant people to change their minds.
Welp,  /me starts to eat donuts  Gotta grow some moobs
Um, I don't really *want* to... I just need some advice to save my victimized cat. She's a pussy and won't fight back. I've been at work for 9 hours, her butthole is probably in shreds right now :(
I GUESS YOU DONT CARE ABOUT YOUR COUNTRY AND WHAT THE NEOCON WAR CRIMINALS HAVE DONE TO IT? JUST 8 YEARS AGO WE WERE NOT LIVING IN A POLICE STATE,,,,LOOK AT US NOW!!! IF YOU DONT STAND AGAINST THIS SHIT NOTHING WILL CHANGE
Sorry but no: female, single and spending the night at home with my family.
Well, I just got denied a tourist visa to the US by a dumb clerk a couple of years ago, so yes, I will feel avenged. :)
Pretty sure that's a Houston, TX district. And really stupid... that haircut looked normal to me.
There are so many good used cars out there. Buying a new car is so dumb. You can lose $5k just driving it off the lot.  Damn, Americans are suckers. 
NO HIS PROBLEM IS THAT WE HAVE NOT GOT HIM ON TRIAL FOR WAR CRIMES AGAINST HUMANITY BRO, **THATS THE FUCKING PROBLEM**
Do you mean the loud-mouthed, back-slapping fraternity president types?
**HILL BABY IN 08**
war. n.    1. A contest between nations or states, carried on by force,   whether for defence, for revenging insults and redressing   wrongs, for the extension of commerce, for the acquisition   of territory, for obtaining and establishing the   superiority and dominion of one over the other, or for any   other purpose; armed conflict of sovereign powers;   declared and open hostilities.  Using the previous metaphor, would trying to destroy the Mafia be considered a war?  And unlike the War on Terror (which is a war on people using a particular tactic) the Mafia was more-or-less an actual organization, albeit loose-knit.
Well, that was strangely well-written, considering the topic.
&gt; freedom of speech is a real bitch when people you don't like exercise it, huh It's only oppression if I agree with the person being oppressed.
i stayed in because im broke and my friends invited me out but i cant tell them that so instead im here alone
You're allowed to bring your own drinks, food and smoke? How generous!
My brother has a '01 Cavalier for $6500. It has 24,000 miles on it.  I bought a '86 VW Jetta GLI for $500. It has ~300,000 miles on it.  Both cars have proven to be extremely reliable (I've spent about as much on my car as my dad has on his '02 Chevy Blazer for maintenance/repairs) and both average ~35mpg (whereas my dad's blazer averages 17mpg).
Frankly the article deserves a lot of sarcasm.
Ignorant comment.  The spinning rims add more resale value to a car compared to what you are losing from owning a car to begin with.
Sucks to be poor doesn't it?
Another great example - Warren Buffet. He still lives in a modest bungalow.  I saw financial guru David Bach who wrote "The Automatic Millionaire" (a great book BTW) and his message is very simple. The only way to gain wealth is to spend less than you earn. Or, live within your means!!  I really learned a lot from his approach, including the idea of the 'latte factor' - this is where our money goes. It's those Starbucks coffees, buying lunches, take out, a pack of gum here, etc. If you examine all your 'frivolous' purchases, you can see where you could cut out a couple of little luxuries, and save that money.  I have personally put this into action, and am proud to have reduced my family's debt to the point that we now will be debt free (except for our mortgage) in 4 years. (With 10 left on our mtg) Considering we had loans for our student loans, car, and consumer debt, I feel such a sense of freedom that its now under control.
OK I educated myself on the We The People Act, sorry for the oversight.  Looks like it is a pushback against what are perceived to be "activist" judges.  There really is no perfect candidate for anybody (and if you find yourself in such a situation, you are most likely quite mistaken). Foreign policy, economics, and our debt hold priority over religion and all these petty relativistic-moral debates over trivial things. I think Mr. Paul has the only plan that's got a chance of getting our budget under control and reinstating respect for the Constitution.
Count me in....... but i'm always horny.
I'm envious of you guys.  My wife is dragging me to some snazzy party where I don't know anybody.  Plus we spent bunch of money for tickets and her fucking dress.  Yay for open bar at least.
Each pixel is about 29 meters wide. So, no, pictures taken with the satellite are not especially detailed, though it's better than it could be.(I know because I'm working with the data as part of a school project. Yay internship!) Bananahead's right, though, the really close-up high-res photos aren't taken with satellites, they're done with planes.
&gt; Then cell phone users can shout to the high heavens too. Bullshit. Last I checked, there was no law against talking on a cellphone. Might want to go look up the meaning of the word "aloud" chum. Hint: It's not a measurement of noise. He's right, you can read whatever you like aloud on a bus. But that bus company has a policy about being loud, which is a different matter entirely.
I'm drawn to you, but I'm not sure why. Have a sister?
I saw an $8000 Chevy that was pretty pimp.  Forget the name of it but think it starts with an A.
We ended it in 2004, but they stole it back. Google "Ohio voting results, 2004."
I did New Year's Eve 1999 in Atlantic City.  I'm not topping free champagne from Donald Trump at midnight anytime soon...
I'll amount for at least 10 of those drunk idiots (I had to down vote though)
"What good fortune for governments that the people do not think"  Adolf Hitler
That was back when we were governed by laws.
I'm not trying to get you into a cycle of ruin but $5000 down on a new car is enough for the salesman to fix your credit application enough to get financed.
Are you saying you didn't invest *any* of your own money in you start-up?   Normally you still lose some of your capital, and the maneuver you pulled doesn't always work. Normally trustees should auction your assets off. You also lose a lot of time and effort that went into the bankrupted company, time that you could have spent making a decent salary. 
What took them 8 years?
Yeah, I'll just be a drunk idiot that stays home.
&gt;metal image Did somebody say "*metal*"? Metalocalypse ftw.
Ladies, ladies ... I think a female president would be great, but Hillary ain't the one to go for. Please stop blindly supporting her. Why am I typing this here?
So you weren't on a highschool team were you.  I could prove it with dozens of youtube clips, but I assume that redditors have been around enough to have seen a few. Are redditors that nerdy that they have never seen or experienced jackass like behavior? Or does my mentioning of it screw up with their preconceived ideas that the behavior in that prison was part of, dare I say it, another U.S. conspiracy?
I'd prefer to be staring at PHP code or playing Xbox/Wii/PC Games. While getting drunk. //Anti-Social
I'm bringing a guitar, a blanket, some champagne, and.... a camera!
So who is responsible for determining what is "better for society" at newspapers, and what is their process for determining the best course of action?
An anagram for the author of the letter is "I Viva Beer."
&gt;Mr. Huckabee said he was showing it to reporters only because reporters were so cynical that if he didn’t show it, they would not believe that he really had made such an ad.  I can't tell whether this a brilliant strategy for getting the negative ad spread virally, or a completely insane way to prove he's being the better man.
WHATS WRONG, TOO MUCH REALITY FOR SUGAR PANTS TONIGHT? HUH SWEET CAKES? NEED ME TO DUMB IT UP FOR YOU LIKE FAUX DOES? TOO BAD!!!
No it's not. Stop trying to special case everything. "Oh, but when we do it, it's different."
I think it's true that in many places you need an AS in something like criminal justice.  So what? I still think it's poor judgment to invest a degree in a career with very poor compensation.
I'm 100% with you. I'm not suggesting we ignore green technology and use diesel engines from this point on. The point is that there are still morons such as my college educated friend who doubt global warming.  I've found people like him have a hard time comprehending the cumulative effect of human activity and since the exhuast from disel engines is often very sooty and visible, compared to the invisble car exhuast most cars have, would help morons like my friend visualize this problem much better.
Wish I could help. :(  I'm not a cat person, we're more of the dog type.  Hope it's not too bad tonight!
EXACTLY. WE HAVE MILLIONS OF INNOCENT IRAQI CHILDREN GETTING BOMBED TO DEATH AND THIS IS ALL WE HAVE TO TALK ABOUT?
sorry to hear that, man.  and it really warms my heart to see that the redditors are making sincere sympathetic comments instead of being jackasses.
Fox News--what a joke of a network. I didn't bother complaining to Fox, instead I sent this e-mail to head of the NH GOP:  &gt; Fergus,  &gt; As I’m sure you are aware, Dr. Paul has been excluded from the Fox News roundtable forum. I think the New Hampshire GOP should issue a press release condemning Fox News for imposing their political views on their election coverage.   &gt; Paul is a legitimate candidate, certainly more so than Fred Thompson, who was included in the Fox forum. Paul has out-raised every other GOP candidate this quarter, his poll numbers recently entered double-digits, and they continue to rise rapidly.  &gt; I hope you will keep the playing field level and fair by issuing a press release. Thank you.  &gt; Regards,  &gt; &lt;me&gt;
"Sad? You're in a very sensitive mood tonight. How sweet." Lord, are you half illiterate, or do you only see what you want to see? Obvs. the latter.
The refrain "I'm one of you" makes me want to vomit, you self-righteous prick. You are *nothing like me* or any of my friends. You are merely a tool of an increasingly oppressive government, and all one has to do for confirmation is see some of the vast collection of YouTube videos showing cops tasering people.  Every single time I've been stopped by a cop ( motorcyle or not ), the cop was *always* the rude one - barking commands, refusing to answer a single question, and eventually lying when it came to an actual report or court appearance.  Here's a hint for you: actual smart people don't have to tell people they're not stupid. They get a useful degree and/or do work that helps society instead of choosing to merely collect taxes by the side of the road.
Racist.
Often, people with the highest salaries have the least financial discipline. It's still an equation - spend less than you earn.
Damn if that doesn't look like an underwater photo of [His Noodly Appendage](http://www.venganza.org/).
I THOUGHT IT WOULD BE RU PAUL STANDING NEXT TO A BURNING CROSS OPPS, DID I SAY RU PAUL? I WAS MEANING TO SAY RON PAUL
can't blame me--i actually *bought* a few albums i had been listening to over the past year.
&gt; It's not dictatorship. You really need to learn the definition of that word before you fling it around. Law != dictatorship.  A law enacted without democratic vote is indeed a dictatorship. You see, even dictatorships have laws, it is the process governments go through while enacting laws that determines if they are a dictatorship or a democracy.  I think this may be why you haven't seen the changes happening around you. You thought democracy=law and you didn't realize you took no part in creating any of these laws!  The funny part is that assuming we are successful with getting Paul into office, you'll be pleasantly surprised by what the *process* of democracy feels like. It will probably feel different at first, but you'll probably like the change.
does fixing stupid cars to look st00pid-awesome appreciate value? http://www.mtv.com/ontv/dyn/pimp_my_ride/series.jhtml
I CONDEM RON PAUL FOR BEING A RACIST NEO CON AND HOW ABOUT THAT?
Getting drunk with the wifey after the kids go to bed.  Doubt we'll even make it through Dick Clark's Rockin' Eve.
RON PAUL IS A FACIST RACIST SCUM WHO GETS DONATIONS FROM KKK
I still don't know how basic salary translates into take home pay ... they might get lots of perks and bonuses. Otherwise I bet waitresses make more than that, with tips and shit.
Sure ya do... (probably how most guys think, though I may be wrong here) Female = I don't have a penis...YAY VAGINA! Drinker = easy Ubuntu = geek  And no, no sisters...sorry.
You would find someone to buy that wheat and so, technically, a market would exist.  Would it be as large a market as it is right now?  I sincerely doubt it.  What moves Mandarin oranges around the world every Christmas is the profit motive and profit means some sort of currency, not simple barter trading like your example.
Huckabee seems to have a long record of ignoring the separation between church and state.
400 restarts? 10 restarts? Restarts?
i almost choked a Suzuki dealer.. then they ran 8 different credit checks and messed my score up... fuckers
Wow, and here I believed Cheney until I saw this.  A real eye-opener.
There's too many of them now.  I don't have the time to "forgive" everyone who tresspasses against me on a daily basis. If you live/work/play in or near a major metro city, you know this to be true.
Yeah, but she can cheat on him there now with her lesbian lover - whats that chicks name again? No, not Condi....the other one...
RON PAUL IS A RACIST BUT ATLEAST HE IS TRYING TO HOLD THIS ADMINISTRATION RESPONSIBLE FOR WAR CRIMES AGAINST HUMANITY WE MUST DO LIKE THESE PROTESTERS AND RISE UP. THE AMERICAN REVOLUTION 2.0 IS COMING AND THE QUESTION IS ARE YOU READY TO FIGHT FOR YOUR SURVIVAL AGAINST THE NEOCON ARMY?
The same sort of jackass who becomes a cop. Or the president of his fraternity.
Fixed.  Cut me some slack though, I'm two shots of JD in already.
ha...and where are you from that has a such a wonderfully more advanced civilization? Id like to know so I can avoid it.  Last time I was in Russia - I found that it was quite advanced and much more advanced in some ways when compared to some of the crap I see going on here in the USofA...  Whens the last time you went to Russia? satx? Id love to see you go there and open your mouth...
Thats a pretty great pic tough I don't agree with it's intent.
been to oregon www.downloadfreepdf.com
CLEARLY YOU HAVE BEEN BRAINWASHED BY THE CURRENT ADMINISTRATION OR MAYBE YOU WATCH TOO MUCH MSM MAN
This article is nothing new. Idiots have been doing this for years.   This is just another article looking for the next sub prime crisis. These kinds of dumb articles come about in the wake of every scandal. It's not going to "ZOMG spread from driveways all the way to Wall Street!" It is going to keep these suckers in debt for their entire lives though. 
Good job on making your case.  Oh...wait...
iJustine is only on there because she's hot. Otherwise it seems like half of these girls are a)hot and b)have a blog. That's all you need to be a 'geek' these days? A 'videoblog?' At least Morgan Webb &amp; Kari Byron know some actual geeky scientific things.  Voted down the videobloggers and managers, and voted up the ones that held a PhD or 'geek' related degree. 
This web site provides information about the degradation of representative democracy in the United States which results from Congress’s longstanding practice of constricting the size of the U. S. House of Representatives relative to the total population. Thirty-Thousand.org (TTO) promotes returning political power to the people by re-establishing House districts that are both smaller and equalized nationally as was originally envisioned by the framers of the federal Constitution and by the states’ conventions which subsequently ratified it.  TTO is a non-partisan and non-profit organization that is not affiliated with any political organization.
1st, 10th, 100th... it is still an "Article of Faith." If you doubt the importance of this to your elders, simply publish an article in any widely circulated piece of media, with your name as the byline stating that the 10th article of faith is not important.
My personal investment was my initial computer purchase, but the capital for my location, my assistant, the office equipment and the operating capital for the first year came from a business loan.  So, technically, I chipped in 3K or so, but the bank chipped in a LOT more than that and I wasn't on the hook for a penny once I showed that I paid myself a salary at or below the market rate. The trustee held an auction for the goods, I went and bid like everyone else, but because the computer was a Mac, very few people at the time showed interest and I was able to get my own computer back for a song.  Yeah, I technically lost something because I had to rebuy my own computer for a couple of hundred bucks, but considering what the amount of the loan was for, this was peanuts.
I think you speak for 90% of redditors with that statement.
&gt;Lake Issyk Kul has played a tremendous role since the inception of human history due to its geographic location at the crossing of Indo-Aryan and other nomadic routes. Archeologists found traces of many religions here-Zoroastrianism, Buddhism, Judaism, Christianity and Islam.  Islam was around 600AD... yet they found a vessel from 500BC...
YEA SORRY TO PISS IN YOUR CORN FLAKES SWEETIE, BUT ITS TIME TO REALIZE WHATS HAPPENING TO OUR FUCKING COUNTRY
There's no magic bullet, and concurrent software _is_ harder to do well than non-concurrent software... but it is quite possible to use a concurrency system that guarantees your code to be deadlock-free.  Any form of concurrency is going to impose certain constraints on your code. It's better to have constraints the language/runtime/OS/etc can ensure don't get violated, rather than just falling into incorrect behaviour when they do.
They are offering their home, their music (live maybe) and their friendship. I'd say that's a fair trade.
“Play your best,” he told them, “and I’ll make you barons and dukes and earls.” Yeah, that's not really the way the barons and dukes and earls got their titles in the old world of inequality, though...
&gt; I wrote this around March of 1988: &gt;  &gt;   /* Take a man page and strip out the _^H's. */ &gt;   ⋮ &gt;  &gt; Here's how I would write it in March of 2004: &gt;  &gt;   #!/usr/bin/perl -lp &gt;   s/_\cH//g;  Or, even shorter:   col -b
WHAT IT IS IS THEM ENDING THE WAR ON MUCLIMS CIVILIANS BUSH HAS ALREADY KILLED 3MILLION INNOCENT IRAQI CHILDREN IN THIS WAR ON TERROR, GOD ONLY KNOWS HOW MANY BRITIN KILLED. THANK GOD THEY GOT THEIR FILL OF DEAD IRAQI CHILDREN AND THEY ARE QUITTING
So you didn't say that people were too stupid to vote? Lets examine...  &gt; Why was laverne and shirley the number one rated show on television. Why is paris hilton on the news.  I'm not quite sure why else you would bring up television or Paris Hilton if you didn't mean that people were stupid. Please explain why you said these things if that is not what you  meant.
"Vote up if you are trying to rationalize how pathetic your life is."  Half the fun is in laughing at drunk idiots with your friends.
Yes, I'm not some jackhole that likes to be different by watching horseshit indy flicks that are made on a $44 budget.
You missed Kids = someone was willing... more than once Nailed the other ones though.
Fears that human cloning will rob us of our individuality are baseless. Nevertheless, the belief itself, even if baseless, may be so widely held as to provide a good practical reason to forbid cloning.
The problem with Godwin' Law is that occasionally comparison to Hitler/Nazis is valid. The take away lesson from WWII was that Hitler and Nazis were not unique -- evil is banal and can occur anywhere. I believe Godwin's Law was originally only intended to rebuke argumentative hyperbole and distortion.  When the comparison is valid, invoking Godwin's Law shields genuine evil ... effectively excusing it.
WE WILL SEE IT WHEN BUSH IS ON TRIAL FOR CRIMES AGAINST HUMANITY BRO
: )  I love those books.
&gt;along with you white kids spending your allowance money on pot and crack Yea all white kids get allowances and use it to buy drugs from inner city wanna be gangsters.
THE NEONCONS AND ZIONISTS ARE THE PROBLEM DUDE
Thanks for the merit.
Not for long.
At times like these, I'm thankful I'm deaf and more movies are being released with captions in the theaters.  But I feel your pain, I really do. :(
Ah yes, knew I was missing one.
Actually, they're doing a pretty decent job. We haven't had a depression in ... 70 years and we used to have them every 20 or 30 years. And inflation is low, and even better, it's fairly predictable. Look at us, we're the richest country in the goddamn world, and life on this planet has never been so good. Which is not to say that it couldn't be even better. Or even a lot better.
It may have won the battle but I don't think it is going to win the war.  I think in the long run the Wal's blue collar appeal will hurt it more than help it.
Seriously, redditors, if you want to experience a revolution, then go to an unstable African or Baltic country.  Forget this nonsense that the Washington elites are quaking in their Prada boots.  It's business as usual.
Sounds like a neighbor got to ironworking first.  If they only had feudalism, the longbowmen could have held off the swords.
Sayonara! Bon Voyagee! Hasta la Vista, baby! Write when you get work! Stay in your own country!  I'll stay in mine!  Do it legally next time!   Bye, Now! Ciao!
I'm staying home **and** dealing with thousands of drunk idiots.
It used to be Shoreview.
YES YOU HAVE BEEN LIED TO BY THE ZIONIST MEDIA AND THE NEOCON WAR MACHINE BRO 911 IS NOT REAL, IT WAS AN ORCHRASTRATED CAMPAIGN BY THE BUSH ADMIN TO STRIKE FEAR INTO AMERICANS THAT WOULD ALLOW HIM TO PILLIAGE IRAQ
someone else beat you to readdit and stole your username? http://programming.reddit.com/user/chromatic/   dang squatters. :)
I expect those in law enforcement to hold themselves and their employees to an even higher standard than they do the public. It's their job to be the bigger person. 
They could use those dispensers that are refilled with packets of liquid soap.  
If there is any reason for anti-gun people to relax their stance for a little while, it is the possibility of a Huckabee presidency.
Having a few friends over for a quiet evening.  BTW lahuman8, sorry about your loss...hopefully the new year will bring you a new four-legged friend, but I can relate; I lost a cat a couple of years ago and I'm still too out of sorts to go get another one.
Only one part of that that I object to; all in all that was a fairly level headed letter.  &gt; Our state has over 5000 traffic laws, I can find one to help you get over your tude. Which is one of the reasons why the state has so many laws.  As number of laws approaches infinity, the likelihood of a random citizen having broken at least one approaches 1.
its still easy to tell he doesn't have an in depth knowledge of the game.   it's important to have someone who knows what they are talking about so that way people aren't told something about whats happenning when often times with him it isn't accurate, or just sounds plain stupid.
The Dunning-Kruger effect in action...
ITS NOT MUSLIMS BRO! MUSLIMS ARE THE ONES BEING MURDERED BY BUSH AND THE ZIONISTS. MUSLIMS NEVER ASKED FOR THIS BUT BUSH WANTED TO PROTECT THE ZIONISTS INTERESTS AND STEAL IRAQS OIL
I live in Washington. A cop ticketed me for speeding, failed to show up in court, submitted a report that was written over a month after the fact, the report he wrote had lies and self contradictions... ...and I still lost. Small towns seem to *always* take the cops side of the story to use traffic stops for what they actually are: tax collection opportunities. Cops are fully aware of this. They live in or nearby the same small towns that benefit from this kind of fraud and are part of the problem. The bullying, self-righteous attitude is just part of the service.
AKA: vote up if you cant deal with hot drunk chicks because your fat
I like the crack head theory.
I hope I live long enough for this to happen.  It would be cool.  
garbage word
Would you hire this guy? I don't think I would, not as a consultant, certainly not as an employee, too much hate inside, who has time to write and document all of this crap?  I loved the part of him talking about google offering him a junior sys admin job, lol.  good lock mate.
HILLARY AND KUCHINICH
"Yeah, we've got dogs and Valvoline, it's a pretty damned good time."  Name that tune!
Even if things were to shift in the future I'd be more inclined that the forced equality would be done through genetics to create some sort of superior race, and the weaker people eliminated. Think something like from the movie Gattaca.  
They were charging only 3 bucks less in 1993, so they can step off with the "boo hoo piracy is killing us" bs.
Bruce Willis is a ghost?!
IM SORRY, I MEAN HILLARY WITH DENNIS AS HER VP
no it isn't.
I saw the one double entendre when I wrote it, but rereading it - wow, there are about four jokes in there. 
NSFW please
I hook up with more women when I drink but that could entirely be because they look hotter then.
Can't wait to hear Chris Matthews and pals act like it's a big surprise when neither of the only two Democrats running (Clinton &amp; Obama) wins.
So where do we find women like you? I didn't know they existed! (and yes, I know, not online)  I'll be going out to a place called coyote joe's tonight with several girls. Should be fun.
CAPITALISM IS WHAT HAS DESTROYED AMERICA BRO, ARE YOU OUT OF YOUR EVER LOVING MIND?
form where will the income how to generate http://www.ebooknetworking.com
Who is Zed?
Well, first order of business to "save the struggling music industry" would be to perhaps stop signing so many shitty bands.
The big problem with this stuff is morale. Its extremely short sighted to slash small *cheap* niceties like this. Sure, you boost your quarter profits by some amount, but employees get really spooked, and then really bitter in very short order. Even if they don't start stealing things to make up for what they think they are owed (rightly or wrongly), the work they do will suffer, and cost the bank far more than the pitance saved by turning off the taps on the hand soap, etc.
FUCK BLACKWATER  FUCK BUSH FUCK THE BUSH, NEOCON, ZIONIST WAR MACHINE THAT ACTIVLY HUNTS MUSLIM CIVILIANS LIKE DOGS
I promise not to feed you.  Promise.
aaaaand another.. 
I've been to plenty of BYOB parties. My point was that you made it sound like they weren't going to ban you from bringing something (you are allowed to BYOB). The pat down at the front door would be an awkward time for sure.
No. It even gained new features in XP, where these also for DOS compatibility?
I forgot my username and the "remind me of your password" link completely failed to work multiple times.
you're one of my favorite trolls, my very favorite pretended to be a teenage goth/emo myspace girl and did such a good job at it but didn't last long :(
Yup, plus you can bring the drinks you like vs drinks someone else likes.
they need usher buttons on the seats like they have flight attendant buttons on planes... then those assholes will stop talking and texting on their bright lcd screens... god i hate theaters.
So did a lot of people.  The difference is who has seen the light since.
You're assuming I'm white because I have a viewpoint different from your own. That's prejudicial and racist.
This story so old.
no no, i don't have any credit at all, it's like, i don't exist to the credit bureaus  plus my used car actually runs really great soooooooo
im staying home tonight because i spent christmas night in the emergency room due to alcohol intoxication. i'd like to say i'll never drink again, but considering that I have no memory of that night, just waking up in the hospital to go home, i probably will drink again soon. what you dont remember never happened, right? sigh.
delete, resubmit.
&gt;giggle all you like, but MS's strength has always come from the power of it's developer tools.  Wow.  I'd say that MS's strength comes from the fact that it was willing to undersell the existing players at the time it started becoming more powerful, provided a fairly gentle learning curve, and exploited lock-in as much as possible.  When I pull down a Linux distribution, I have the full-blown development environment that everyone else in the world uses.  I have valgrind, which instruments the code to effectively create a VM for diagnostics.  I have editors with decades of contributions from around the world.  I've sloccount and doxygen.  I've a fast, easy-to-use make system (which unlike the MS system, works well with hierarchical sub-projects shared across projects).  They failed to produce a standard ABI for C++ (COM is basically an attempt to produce part of a standard ABI).  Their scripting system was the weak, verbose batch system.  MS has some tools (the Visual RAD stuff) that allow one to throw up a front end quickly.  They aren't exceptional -- I'd say that Apple's Hypercard was an easier-to-learn, cleaner contemporary -- but if you haven't any familiarity with anything similar, they're usable.  C# fills the high-level programming language gap on Windows.  It's like Java or Python.  It calls out to C fairly well (though Microsoft went out of their way to make Win32 access from C# miserable).  It's not the Second Coming, though.  Visual Studio used to come with a profiler.  I think the "Enterprise Architect" version or something like that still does.  The stock one doesn't.  Gprof is a pretty standard tool in the Linux world.  /proc provides a marvelous interface for even simple tools to access fairly complex data.  It's reasonable to write tools in perl or shell that would almost certainly be C/C++-based on Windows.  There is a powerful, inherently parallelized mechanism for writing scripts (pipelines) in the Unix world.  Microsoft's shell lacks a lot of the pipeline functionality (and totally lacks the necessary POSIX programs) to make this a workable development environment.  Win32 is large and not well-designed.  There are, what, about three network APIs, (standard blocking/nonblocking that's shared with POSIX, asynch, IOCP-based)?  How many "*Ext" functions do you run across in Win32?  The Unix world has a fraction of these, despite many more years running around.  tmpnam() might qualify as downright misdesigned, but I can't think of masses of broken-by-design Unix APIs.  What specific characteristics do you feel are exceptional about MS as a development environment?
I have to note that it is made out of wood. A very good material for burning, I must say. Still, I wouldn't euphenize that thing.
sorry to hear that bud. Happy new years anyways!
I DONT KNOW WHAT TROLL MEANS BUT ID LIKE TO MEET YOUR FRIEND I DONT REALLY LIKE EMOS MYSELF BUT EMOS AND ANTI-WAR PEOPLE SUCH AS MYSELF HAVE ONE THING IN COMMON... **WE WANT THIS WAR CRIMINAL BROUGHT TO FUCKING JUSTICE**
For anybody that thinks this is anti christian its not its anti idiot
pssst: you misspelt blag...
It's a tough call, between the drawing and the thousand year old leprechaun flute. 
or they were paralegals and secretaries from the same firm.. i know many of these hoes and they act like lawyers and/or nazis all the time.
WHAT ABOUT THE WAR ON IRAQIS CHILDREN THAT BUSH TAKES PART IN? HOW MANY 10'S OF MILLIONS OF IRAQI KIDS HAVE DIED BECAUSE OF BUSH?
I believe you to be correct. This is the purpose of the git-send-pack and git-receive-pack executables.   It's also why the SSH git transport is smart and the HTTP/webdav transport is dumb -- with naive webdav there is no benefit from git-(send|recieve)-pack. (But you also don't have to install it on the server)  Incidentally, because git-(send|receive)-pack write to stdout you can imagine all sorts of other bizarre incantations for updating packs across whatever odd transport mechanism.
You won't find one at a bar.  Most chicks that go to a lot of bars are desperate.  Sure it'll get you laid, and if that's what you want, just use a rubber (or 4). Personally, we met through a mutual friend.  What you really should do is just start talking to girl.  (Yes, I KNOW!)  Eventually, you'll find the right one.
Show 'em what you got, Barack!
Component is still analog.
LOL
Stewart and Colbert don't really need to have writers on staff when the jokes write themselves.
CALL THE CLAN UP AND TELL EM THEIR #1 MEMBER NEEDS SOME CASH
Now, now - don't hold it in. Tell us how you really feel. 
I don't have much experience programming, but the small contributions I've made have all been simple bugfixes.  These are (sometimes) easy to write and easy for others to accept into their codebase.  I suspect that it would be much harder to contribute an API change both because of the backwards compatibility problem and because of the ego problem "this isn't a bug; you're just changing the API for non-provable improvements in ergonomics, esthetics, etc."  Has anyone contributed API improvements to some else's project?  How did you go about it?  Has anyone accepted API changes from a third party?
I'm lonely and depressed this new years. Nothing seems to make me feel better.
Damn.  I actually knew a stripper named "Lexi."  Very unpleasant person.
im going out, and i'm going to BE a drunken idiot.
When I was in University, one text I read said that Germany hovered at or near 90%.  Prompted by your question, I went out hunting and challenged my own assertions ... wow.  20% decline in Germany in 10 years?  35% drop in France?  What the hell happened to Europe in the past decade? A lot of my points still hold - can union members be directors on the board in most European nations?  Sure.  Can they in the US?  Not without a major war.  All the same, I'm mighty disappointed.   
BRO I CAN ONLY BE HONEST AND LET IT ALL OUT, IF YOU DONT SPEAK AND SPEAK LOUDLY, THEY WILL NEVER GET THE FUCKING MESSAGE
Well, I mostly question whether or not he understands what he's doing.  This says a lot to me:  &gt; That’s right, dude works on Rails in some capacity, apparently writing tons of shitty fucking code with his butt buddy Nicholas Sekar. Yet, nobody knows him. He’s got more web sites than Elvis and Chuck Noris combined and nobody knows him. He’s written mountains more open source code than me and no-bo-dy knows him.  So what if nobody you know knows him?  Is that how you know you've won?  By how many random internet people know who you are?  Well, if that's the case, yes, open your mouth as wide as possible.  On the other hand, if you want to have an actually useful reputation, that can help you find good work that you enjoy, well, talk is cheap.  One respectable contact that really knows and trusts you, and visa versa, will do more for your career than thousands of gawking bystanders.
Good post.  No church needs more than 5% of your income.  To give them 10% or more only enables them to steal from others.  The tithe was established as temple tax in Judea, there is no such thing as a tithing principle in the Bible.  There is no temple in Jerusalem to tithe for. That is why the Jews subscribe to the synagogue rather than tithe to it.  One can argue there is a giving principle, but that's up to you.
I like the "mr_" part.  lol
I was under the impression that the iPod had no such levy, and that only the Zune did. Am I mistaken?
No, all that would be needed is that the gene that codes for "maleness" be expressed early in development.  There are like 3 or 4 copies of it, only one on Y. The rest are just dormant.
Iiiimm the leepprechaaaunnn   seriously though, don't piss on it's dead body whatever u do.
I was kind of torn myself.  After careful consideration I decided that a crack head in a tree beats a thousand year old leprechaun flute in the hand.
It's called a title, not a run on sentence.
oh come on, this sounds like FUN http://leda.lycaeum.org/?ID=8464
get well and happy new year!
Wow, lay off it a bit.  I mean you do realize that talking IN ALL CAPS ALL THE FUCKING TIME is not going to sway ANYONE.  If you really cared about our country, you would use logic, instead of caps lock.
Whatever. Did you bother to look at the poll? If you look at the republican leader right now, it's Ron Paul. Does Ron Paul seem like an ultra-pro corporate candidate?  As other people have said, this is a programmatic-error (a lousy one), and this "issue" doesn't stand to make any headlines anywhere. As a beginning-programmer, I did the same kind of stupid things in some of my work - it's the first thing I thought of when I saw the poll.
It's a holiday in Cambodia  It's tough, kid, but its life  It's a holiday in Cambodia  Don't forget to pack a wife
Well, we have a guy with a bachelors degree working in our mail room for minimum wage. And he's dumber than a box of rocks. So I guess everyone with a degree isn't guaranteed to shine brightly either.
I can vouch for this dude's Vancouver rant.  It's a Microsoft toilet here whereby people look for .Net and SQL Server people. With a DB2 and Sybase background, I have my choice of maybe 10 companies besides IBM...  If I was looking that is.  ( Yes I know Sybase makes me probably qualified to work with SQL Server -&gt; that's where I came from but I don't care for SQL Server salaries in Vancouver ).
ditto
Umm Hmm Thats why they can buy up every bank you move to.  "Cannibal capitalism" as Orwell so lovingly called our brand of commerce, has its inherent flaws.
In the high-speed digital world, all signals are analog.
I didn't either.  Thank god for comments section.
Your saying that's bad? It worked
remove slang and it sounds boring/mundane
It's funny.  He doesn't look Irish. 
I'm not saying you do ... but plenty of companies will attempt to drive down the price they pay for your services by using the *supposed* market value as a lever.  Seeing as this is your salary they are talking about, it is in your best interests to argue that the market value is actually higher than their estimate, not just that you are worth more than that average.
shoreview was pretty much entirely developed in 1999.
I can has royaltyz?
I didn't even know you were a jedi.   Good call. 
Let me just staple this to the back of your resume... If I was interviewing someone and I saw that... well... I'd probably just look at the next candidate on the list. My gut feeling is that "interpersonal stuff" would just not be worth the headaches. I'd rather have an ok developer that doesn't cause me any grief than a really good one who needs lots of care and feeding. And that rant just screams constant care and feeding required.
reaffirming all blind prejudices and steadfast beliefs i hold (/sarcasm)
&gt;until he mentioned that he had been writing software professionally for 15 years.  Certainly isn't an older guy though - there's absolutely no benefit of posting this online - it's just stupid because it'll be there forever thanks to stuff like google cache and archive.org
From what I remember, exactly that.
vote up if you're going to be a drunk idiot.
Respect is a two-way street. People who treat a police officer with basic human respect, as a professional doing a job that society has entrusted them to do, will likely get respectful treatment in return. That doesn't mean being subservient, just polite and civil.  One might say that letting even the slightest infraction go without a ticket is actually costing local taxpayers, and failing to enforce the Will of the People. Getting away with stuff *is not an entitlement*. Officer's discretion means that it's their call whether it's in the public interest to ding you for your broken taillight or going 5 miles over, or let you off easy.   Swearing at an officer, treating him like an idiot, or trying to lie your way through an encounter  will naturally wear out any goodwill a cop might have; and so again, it should be no surprise if they use their discretion to help you.  Organizations like Flex Your Rights say the same thing. http://www.flexyourrights.org/traffic_stop_scenario  &gt;2) Be Courteous &amp; Non-Confrontational If you are pulled over, the first thing you should to do is turn your car off, turn the dome light on (if it's nighttime), roll down the window, and keep your hands on the steering wheel. Don't immediately reach into your glove compartment for your license and registration. Officers want to be able to see your hands for their own safety. Wait until the officer asks to see your paperwork before retrieving your documents.  &gt;The first thing you should say to the officer is, "Hello officer. Can you tell me why I am being pulled over?" The officer may give you a hard time or say, "Why do you think I pulled you over?" Tell the officer you don't know. Most importantly, do not apologize after you get stopped, because that can be considered an admission of guilt and could be used against you later in court.  &gt;Show your identification if it's requested. Be respectful and non-confrontational. Refer to the police as "Sir," "Ma'am," or "Officer." Remain calm and quiet while the officer is reviewing your documents. If the officer writes you a ticket, accept it quietly and never complain. Listen to any instruction on paying the fine or contesting the ticket, and drive away slowly.
Only if the new pseudo-emacs ran a lisp interpreter and the libs allowed access to all the pertinent variables and functions (much of emacs is currently written in C anyway). Emacs is emacs because it's entire runtime can be configured using lisp.  If you can't do that, it's not emacs.  Whether to still call a lexically scoped dialect of lisp based version "emacs" or just "ohmygoditsabouttimemacs" is up for debate.
No, it didn't. My ethnic identity has not be revealed here. Not by me and certainly not by you.
i have cold sores from teh flu... so i won't be able to get that kiss at midnight.  therefore, i'm staying in tonight with a buncha movies, some crown royal and coca-cola.
Don't tase him, he's just voicing his opinion in a completely calm and rational way. ...bro.
Thanks, I'll try to remember that...
rofl what do u think? windows is made for games but i understand your paine
No...not sure if this is a joke or not, but I've never heard of it.  EDIT:  Thanks for the links guys.  I'll have to look into it.
Still stands, if you aren't absent from the entire system for some reason they can get you financed.  I never should have been given a loan but i got it no problem. :)
Define advanced.
They kinda look like they suck
Any night of the year is a good night to get laid.  As usual, however, I'll be at home browsing reddit :(
It's in Kyrgyzstan, not Russia.  Also, it's by no means totally unexpected.  It's a region that had been one of the world's major crossroads for thousands of years, and it was already known that relatively advanced people had been in the area for a long time.  The only thing that's really surprising is the extent of the finds.
My wife is working.  So I'm popping in Blade Runner: the Final Cut, grabbing an orange soda and vanilla wafers, and bringing in the new year that way.
you too mate happy new year thx !
I DONT TASE PEOPLE IM NOT A POLICE STATE EMPLOYEE IM NOT A NEO CON IM NOT A ZIONIST AND IM DAMN SURE NOT A LIBERAL HIPPY TYPE
Incorrect, you do not need a network connection to start Acrobat. I just did. As of CS 2 you will have to activate the software, but you can do that over the phone if you lack an internet connection. 
Are you LiberalConservative of K5 fame?
Anyone got toll for the Troll?  
WHATS K5 FAME?
I assume like Chuck Facts these are totally fake.
CREDO mobile claims to give 1% of their profits to progressive causes which is all well and good. It's something I could get behind even if it doesn't turn out to be very much money.   However, I recently received advertising from them suggesting I switch from AT&amp;T or Verizon because of their participation in illegal wiretapping to CREDO. It sounded great, except for the fact that they excluded Sprint (who also participated in illegal wiretapping) from their criticisms. Why? Because their network runs on Sprint.   I hate sleazy marketing. While 1% of their profits go to progressive causes (on my family's $1200/year wireless tab that works out to be $12.00 of revenue and profit would be less), I might as well keep my current service and donate to my favorite causes.
Nono, Vaht is it sinking about.  lol
That's why Vonnegut is a genius.
"mp3s or it didn't happen"
i AM one of those drunk idiots
DONT WASTE MY TIME AND TRY TO DEVERT FROM THE TOPIC AT HAND
Not remotely sinister and threatening enough to be calling yourself thekgb. Go to the back of the line and get a new login.
Clearly you have a dizzying intellect.
He also gave some positive space to Huckabee.
Well he basically called most of his clients morons.  If you truly believe that, it will eventually show through.  Sure, not all of us believe 100% in our client's ideas, but to really think of them as morons instead of risk-taking entrepreneurs, is a bit harsh.
Time to hit the party's and have a little fun, look at hot women, dance and sip a few beers, then take a cab home. Goodnight everyone.
This story was just another attempt at ideological warfare against communism at the time. Yet communist societies did encourage excellence in skills and did reward excellence generously. Just not in monetary terms - more in social terms. Communism failed in other respects than that of promoting the equality of humanity of its subjects.   It really says something about the Western education system that ideological warfare was/is also part of its high school English curriculum doesn't it?
Word for word exact article here: http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/Advanced_Russian_civilization_found/rssarticleshow/2658962.cms http://www.andhranews.net/Technology/2007/December/28-Archaeologists-discover-remains-27642.asp http://www.zeenews.com/articles.asp?aid=415598&amp;sid=FTP  A related but different article  http://en.rian.ru/analysis/20071227/94372640.html
Upmodded for reminding us that Rick Astley rocked that Nerd-With-Big-Pipes look long before Clay Aiken
#Please dont: * Conduct polls using posts. If you feel you must use Reddit to conduct a poll do it using a comment. Create a self referencing post and then add a comment for readers to mod up or down based on their answer to your poll question. Also, be sure to indicate in the title of your post that the polls is being conducted using comments. Including something like "(use comments to vote)" in the title would probably be sufficient.
Smoke a joint and forget about the pain.  ;)
Good bye, Mary Lou. :'(
THIS IS CRAZY HOW CAN YOU BARK ABOUT THE TITLE AND GRAMMER IDIOT FACE?   THIS IS OUR COUNTRY GOING TO A POLICE STATE AND ALL YOU CAN TALK ABOUT IS GRAMMAR? HAH! COME TALK TO ME WHEN YOU AND YOUR FAMILY IS SITTING IN A HALLIBURTON CONCENTRATION CAMP
Linyos is a well known Communist computer hacker, and it's true his operating system steals all the essentials for running a computer from the Windows.  Anyone who uses this Linyos is either a hacker, or, as this article states, a joker.  Unless you know exactly what you are doing, stay away, lest Linyos takes over your bank accounts.  http://www.adequacy.org/public/stories/2001.12.2.42056.2147.html
ditto, buddy.  in the meantime, hope you have some medical christmas trees to burn this evening.
Are they going to let this guy keep driving with his "medical condition"?
SO YOU THINK THE RIGHT WING IS GOOD? ATLEAST YOU CALLED FAUX BY ITS PROPER NAME A+++ ON THAT ONE DUDE
And remember - speed kills.
Not sure if it's applicable, but: http://www.paulgraham.com/say.html
ANOTHER 4 YEARS OF BUSH AND CO?
But I don't like to hold prejudices and steadfast beliefs. I don't think that is the key to happiness though. Rush Limbaugh doesn't seem happy to me.
It would be nice if just once on reddit, anyone, just once, could criticize another country without having the US brought up.  
This is an example of how not to act professionally.  Each platform industry from Java to Ruby to .NET to *x* all have these problems, it is called teams.  Teams can be good and bad.  It is your JOB to make a team work better.  He might have many good claims that could be better illustrated with a temperament that allows facts and scientific method to show through but never, ever, never ever, never... go junior high on their asses.  Zed not only burnt a bridge, he nuked that mutha chucka. I am hoping it was theater.  
Which is odd because he must be Irish or his great great grandfather wouldn't have been able to pass down the leprechaun flute. 
Not at home, at *work*, making sure all the people that manage to get themselves drunkenly injured or killed during the evening's festivities also get their faces on TV. Gotta add insult to injury.   Besides...  1) New Year's Eve in Times Square? Been there, done that, more than once, and anything more than once is too much.   2) In the immortal words of Murphy Brown, New Year's Eve is amateur night. 
Maybe your point is vague, poorly thought out and offensive. Your most recent post is more of the same.
what about adequacy fame?
THE RESISTIANCE IS REAL ITS A GROWING MOVMENT IN AMERICA MUCH LIKE THE UNDERGROUND RAILROAD USED TO BE WE ARE GAINING MOMENTUM AND MOVING INTO PLACE. THE REVOLUTION IS FAST APPROACHING ANDF WE WILL SOON SEE THE DAY THAT BUSH STANDS TRIAL FOR HIS CRIMES AGAINST HUMANITY
I wouldn't know.  Seems like I generally have enough money to do what I need.
Reminds me of this:  &gt;So, I went to this store one day. And the lady showed me the way to the changing room.  &gt;She said, 'if you need anything, I'm Jill.'  'Oh my god.' i thought. 'i've never met a woman... with a conditional identity before!'  Then I thought, 'if I don't need anything, who are you?' -- Demetri Martin
in all fairness, not all of them are idiots or even drunk. I'll be hanging with the Rolling Geniuses
These aren't the Paulites we're looking for, move along.
Cookies are the most obvious thing....  But I think the NYT do some funky shit depending on your browser's user agent. I think if you are google (and presumably any other search engine) you can access articles without logging in at all, but if you're using a normal browser (and not faking your useragent) you'll have to login. Maybe they've broken their agent detection in some way?
Hey baby, what's your sign?
I prefer ranch on my cucumbers, but hey, whatever, to each his own...
WHATS THAT? STOP WASTING MY GOD DAMN TIME BRO
But so many of us are in love with the idea of the truly meritocratic aristocracy, where the most perfect person really does get to be Emperor (and just dances around rather than abusing his power), so much so that we pretend anyone with power or privilege really must deserve it.  (I'm also amused by how this story is understood today as a conservative message against liberal "equalizing" measures like affirmative action and progressive taxation.  When I read the story in the 1980s, it seemed obvious at the time that it was a liberal message against the anti-intellectualism and social conformity advocated by conservatives.)
Make it quick or we will revoke your Reddit card.
Cluster fuck comes to mind when I think of pakistan.   That video is some seriously convincing evidence. Does the UN deal with shit like this? Probably not.
just like the Buddha! sort of
Oh, definitely go!  Just have fun and be safe (in all sense of the word).
It would be funny if this turned into a national referendum on FoxNews.
Where did those 1M jobs go? I am a Canadian and ended up having to find work in the U.S. after NAFTA, because so many jobs were 'exported' south. Part of Canada's problem was that our criminal Conservative government that rammed NAFTA through pegged the Canadian dollar at .95c to the US dollar. It wasn't worth nearly that much at the time, and so Canadian labour overnight became much more expensive that US labour.
Hmmm... Looks like a squirrel wearing a hat.
&gt;False. Profit means wealth. You are headed off on a tangent about currency and profit.   Do the simple math - if you replace the labour of 90% of the world's population with machines, then you have 90% of the population out of work.  If they don't relocate to some other sector (and some won't) or if they move to a sector where the pay is drastically lower (service sector), then their buying power and discretionary income, as a group, declines significantly.  A huge driver for the decline of the middle class in the US (and Europe) is the move offshore of the "middle class" manufacturing jobs.  Sure, those folks found other employment, but only a very few move up (technology) and quite a few of them move down (service sector) and that influx of people into the service sector has driven down pay pretty much everywhere.   Enough of that happens and your market is a fraction of the size it is now, is more based on necessities than fringe benefits and the allure of the world's biggest market starts to dry up. Not that this is necessarily a bad thing, given the overconsumption in North America, but I'm not going to pretend this shift won't have social issues.  The drastic shift of wealth to the upper 1% or so in the past 30 years won't continue long-term without major social upheaval.
Thank you thank you thank you i have been saying this the entire timem
How old are you, honestly?
There are lots of ancient technological remains  that we can't explain. Get used to it. There were some amazingly advanced technologies back then.
How do the "[free](http://www.richersounds.com/information.php?cda=static&amp;cst=supercare_info#supercare)" extended warranties work? ( The ones that offer your premium back, if you haven't claimed by the end of the period )... I'm guessing a stupidly small window to make the claim, combined with insane paperwork.
You just made a million nerd's head explode.
Make sure your cabby keeps the shiny side up speedkills.
This headline would be so much better if "Business" were replaced with "Reddit"
So as hunter gatherers we had to model animal behavior, and develop social skills so that when the leader yelled for us to attack the elephant, we didn't have half of us sitting it out, while the other half went out and got stomped.   Then we mastered agriculture, which amounted to figuring out how to plan. On a given size piece of land, you can feed a lot more people with agriculture than you can with hunting.  That is why when there is a war between the hunters and the farmers, bet on the farmers, because they will show up with 5,000 to the hunters' 50.   Then you have to figure out when the solstices are.  Besides, knowing that on around December 25 the days are going to start getting longer again, you can impress everybody by setting a tree or a yule log ablaze and announcing you've reversed the shortening of the days.
I own my bicycle, suck it, debtors! :)
You cannot be lost if you have nowhere to go.
Pics or it didn't happen.
You've gone downhill lately.
HOW OLD DO YOU HAVE TO BE TO JOIN THE MOTHERFUCKIN SECOND UNITED STATES REVOLUTIONARY WAR? HUH? IS THERE A GOD DAMNED AGE LIMIT ON WHO CAN FIGHT? NO? THEN WTF DOES IT MATTER SMART ASS? IM OLD ENOUGH TO FIRE A GUN AND THATS ALL THAT MATTERS
Upmodded because I wish I could be in DC right now.  Damn those holiday trips home.
Paper.....it smells like.....Democracy!
Yup, Zed made some major critical mistakes when it comes to $$$ and managing his clients.
I NEED SO MUCH ATTENTION LOOK AT ME OH MY GOD JUST LOOK AT MEEEE
were they doing drugs?
Holy shit, the reddit police are out tonight of all nights enforcing the "reddit standards and policies of good posting". Who would have known. Such dedication
&gt;How does this story, communism, socialism, and the ACLU all fit together?  If you look at the story's message as anti-conformity rather than anti-equality, it makes more sense.
&gt; A 55-year-old Sumatran orang-utan, thought to  &gt; be the world's oldest in captivity or the  &gt; wild, has died at a zoo in the US.  Reading that, I expected the next sentence to say something like:  &gt; Nonja was found dead after being mauled to  &gt; death by a tiger....   ;)
No its not its called shutting the fuck up and listening to the law. They dont have to do anything. If you have a problem with the law take it up with congress.  My 2 cents
People with integrity sometimes have anger issues. I'll take an honest person with anger issues over someone who smiles as they shank you.
I don't know much of anything about photography, but I don't much like looking at the picture.  Kind of like expecting someone to like a Will Wright video game.  If you don't like it, you don't like it.
its a login name moron - perhaps you feel threatened because of your lack of sense? or perhaps you feel threatened because of your misconceptions about other countries?  Im back at the front of the line now...and Ill tell you that I am an American born in the USA - meaning Ill pick whatever name I choose as a login and Ill stand where I please....and as for the idiots who like to pan other nations? Id gladly kick them out of the line with my foot - as they are the ones ruining the American reputation around the world.  In case you didnt notice - the rest of the world thinks the USA is filled with jackass rednecks....  Im starting to agree.
That's only one side of the equation, where the demand outstrips supply.  Look at the opposite end like the service industry, where the supply vastly outstrips demand ... no benefits, low pay, poor conditions, companies like Wal-Mart getting sued in class action suits for unpaid overtime, etc. In that situation, it is the workers competing for scarce good jobs and not the companies competing for workers.
Fuck people.  /wrist.
Welcome to a few years ago.
No way that Thompson will be that high up.
I believe it's called douchebaggery. 
A liberal democrat resorting to violence, thats impressive and a new one to me. You acting on reason or feeling right now?
Wowowowowowowowowowowo.
I know they do this, with home mortgages. Are you sure they do it with cars too? Seems pretty crazy, and perhaps less necessary because less money is involved and it is payed back over a shorter period of time.
I plan on it.  Or "firestorm."
donuts? nay. you need to eat a lot of chicken breasts. get some estrogen into you!
I thought he was in Iowa, cracking Hillary jokes.  Edit: ok, I get it, the joke is old.  Jeez oh pete.
It's Atlantis, no no MU, no it was built by aliens!
Just this week I was looking at the car pages in the Wash. Post and marveling at the Toyota Avalon *lease* for $299/month. And in the fine print: "with $6200 up front payment". I'm guessing someone in marketing figured out that's how much people wanting Avalons will bring in trade-in value.
Anyone here shop at these two stores often? What is the report from the field?
It is part of "Welcome to the Monkey House" collection of short stories.  Highly recommended.  Picked it up and read it in 4th grade (kind of hoping it was about monkeys) and was just blown away.  I had no idea people wrote stuff like that.
Firefox knows that reading Pravda on Hudson (except for Krugman) is bad for you.
That's a helluva lot of negativity, and there is one common denominator. Either Zed is the cause, or he gravitates towards the people he hates.  If I met someone in person with that kind of attitude, I'd be hard pressed to not antagonise him too.
Mobile is a beautiful town...the minds there not so much.
Poor grammar, and not the end of the world :)
ALL OF THESE DRUNKEN IDIOTS ARE RETARDED!!!
Meh I'll be in the same neighborhood, close enough so I don't have to drive. Be safe everyone.
Sometimes I forget that I'm conversing with a bunch of idiots.
Got nothing to do with excellence.
I like
why?  if you criticize another country - you think you will be free to open your  mouth without being told how much yours sucks?   Typically American...bitch and moan - but cant take the truth about their fat lazy asses.  Be glad that there are OTHER Americans here - who will tell you....get off your fat lazy ass and stop bitching about other countries.
I'm going out to a party co-hosted by my ex.  I'd rather be at home.  Trust me.  Jesus this will be painful.  
So who has the actual video?  Can we get a link?
wait what?  is this a pro-tax cut comment?
if he meant to "paint all Jews with that wide Zionism brush" there would be no need to use the term "Zionist Jew" - he could just say "Jew."  So you're just plain wrong.   There are zionist Jews and there are anti-zionist Jews. I don't really think that there are Jews on the fence. But, if there are - they better get on the right side of it before it's too late.
Wowowowowowowowowowowo???  Oh, now I get it - My keyboard is broken. 
Coming from someone who just posted the same type of thing three hours ago?  Typical neo-con hypocrite. 
lol talking about lies lair?
Actually, the thinking is "Use more infrastructure than I do? Then PAY FOR IT."
This is true, I've come across at least 100 Ubuntu users who did not know when to use sudo so they used it all the time "just in case".  The users are the problem. 
In other words don't drink and fuck either.
its actually good for haemhorroids (seriously). 
Not primitive.
You must learn about your heritage bro.
you're pissed because you "actually wanted to read the article"?   Then you must be pissed at yourself.
can people stop posting non-programming stuff in programming.reddit.com  there is netsec.reddit.com for this garbage
I'm not staying at home tonight, uh mmm oops sorry wrong vote. 
DAMN STRAIGHT! What the hell else is there to watch?
I like the cut of your jib.
Ahimsa starts with an A, and I am NOT non-violent. Apt since I dont have that A in my name.
Then keep him home with you.
I think [we've been nuking it](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Operation_Crossroads) for about sixty years, but it keeps getting bigger.
&gt; Our state has over 5000 traffic laws, I can find one to help you get over your tude. I work with an office full of lawyers, you piece of shit pig. I can find one of them that will help you get over yours.
We'll keep a light on for you.
&gt; C# certainly no harder to use than say, JEE  First, C# is a language, not a tool.  Second, your comparing it to JEE! That's like claiming you're a good fighter because you beat up the retarded 6th grader who lives next door.  &gt; Visual Studio is outstanding, I do not know of a IDE that can top it overall.  Emacs tops it.  That's why they are cloning emacs.  It doesn't top it in every way, mind you, and VS has some great features, but it's just not in the same class from a power user perspective.  &gt; People can like or dislike languages and environments for whatever reasons, but to dismiss the power and impact of MS's tools and languages is silly.  MS gives you great tools to hook into THEIR frameworks, THEIR way.  As long as you are building an app that fits into the MS world view, then yes, their tools kick ass.  This is not called "powerful", but rather "specialized".  Try writing a Haskell program to talk to a Corba Orb for services and accessing Mysql DB using MSVS.  Emacs is up to the task.  vim can handle it.  VS is a joke in this scenario.  And where is smart tabbing in VS?!?  For God's sake, it's 1990 calling, they want their indentation engine back!
I'm surprised that they humbled themselves enough to acknowledge that emacs even exists.  But why didn't they simply work with the Gnu Emacs for Windows project?  I'm sure it could be modified to provide all kinds of support for .NET.  It's open source after all....oh wait, nevermind.
&gt;strung together  More like stapled.
Who says the two are mutually exclusive?
You just fed me by commenting which is sort of my point.  The best defense against Liberal is to not encourage him.
I thought the bit about reviewing and interviewing consultants a bit harsh/interesting (I am not a consultant). If that practice was to catch on, who in their right mind would want to work for a consulting company? (perhaps that is the idea - keep it all independent - no place for thoughtworks).
Advance civilization = no Burger King, Starbucks or McDonalds found.  Happy New Year.
According to the article, Gish won their top Indie Game award in 2004.
I don't know if using 4 rubbers is any better than just 2, unless you have problems with longevity.
or "Break Employee Room"
Doesn't seem to work in china.
Sorry, bluedot, I just can't go along with your statement.   He is saying "I'm human. I can make mistakes. Treat me as a fellow human." I am old and have never been mistreated by a LEO. Some friends and I were found back in the boonies on New Year's Eve with a keg. We were 18-19 at the time. Mo. HP officer found us - how I don't know - cautioned us to stay there 'til it was gone. Wished us a 'Happy New Year' and left.   They are just folks, just like you &amp; I. Well, me maybe. Leucocytes for the body of society.
Perhaps, then, you should stop slumming, log off and never come here again.
I'll be home dealing with a small group of drunk idiots. I am one of them.
I read the gaming reddit, and it's actually better than the main reddit.  At least until someone makes The Ron Paul Game.
Revenging insults?!?
hehe, sorry, just saying where ;)
dont help a blonde
Upmodded for having a vagina
&gt; Stopped reading right there. That's called abuse of power. Amen to that. I don't care where he went to college or what his GPA is, he blew it right there if he was trying to not be a total prick.
What ever happened to multitasking?
Author is an idiot that argues with facts.  
Is that like walking and chewing gum at the same time?
After living in Calif in a 'Mexican' neighborhood I can guarantee that they target Mexican kids in far more evil ways as well. First, many Mexican kids who have minor behavior problems are diagnosed as having some sort of mental problem and doped up on a bunch of drugs and medicines they don't need.  Why?  Because "special needs" kids get twice the funding of regular kids and are exempted from any standards.  Most Mexican parents who don't know any better go off thinking the school system is doing them a huge favor.  Second, many of the Mexican kids will come home with straight A's on their tests and homework no matter how bad or incorrect the answers are - the teachers and administrators just pass them thru the system for the funding, but then blow them off knowing darn well that their parents will never know the difference. There is one exception, at standardized test time (where funding is involved) - the schools literally terrorize the kids.  It was so bad, I saw kids coming home crying in fear over those tests.  How dare they call those things schools.  If you ask me they can't shut those fucking things down fast enough.  They should close them down for all kids, not just the Mexican ones.  
This seems totally reasonable in fact, point taken!  Have you know the performance characteristics of the Queue object?
Exactly, I wish in some of edward's anti corporate tirades he would include this in the shit that goes on.
Now if only we could at least reach a truce in the vicious "War on Christmas". 
Classic, but very old. Look for the Bubb Rubb/Leprechaun remix...
I think I just puked in my mouth
Asshole got fired.  Which is what he deserved.  That's all that matters. 
imitation is the highest form of flattery
She is Foxy!!!
Yeah, I'm looking for a dom right now. I've decided to try craigslist when I get back to school.
I don't think any reddit republican supports anyone other than Paul. 
Downvoted. Come back when you've saved up a nickel.
Dude, I was joking.  I know who you are talking about.  
I was driving through Oregon (CA plates) late at night a few months ago going 60ish max (cruse control) in a 55. A cop going the other way, flips a U-Turn in the middle of the street and then speeds after me to catch up and turns on his lights. He gives me a ticket for going 75 and since I'm from out of town had to pay up vs challenge it in court.
I'm sure it's already been mentioned, but any complaints should be directed at Fox sponsors. It does work if enough do it.
yeah, don't be like that asshole.
They are now that GW doesn't have his poodle boy to lead around any more.
I hope one is a grammar checker for the internet.
I LOVE YOU
Amen.
He's a moron, only way he thinks to get his point across is with ALL FUCKING CAPS
I hope that you're not being serious, but on the off chance that you are: do you also keep all your net worth  in gold coins on your person, and if you drop a coin or two--or get mugged of it all--just learn to let go?  Some us may be able to do that (I'm thinking of monks here), but for most of us the loss of years of work is catastrophic.  I should know--I managed to accidentally my entire corpus of college work one day about five years after I graduated.  Every paper, every project, every line of work--gone.  I was a moron, but I've learnt from my mistakes.  Now I have local &amp; offsite backups...
Got to hate those anti-war protesters, don't you...
I have a version of his localtime as a bash function:   epoch2time() {   date --date "1970-01-01 UTC $1 seconds"  }  Less perl :)
The Titanic sinks?
Hmmm... I reckon I've paid enough in bank fees to those bastards over the year to outfit at least 10 branches with soap.  Bah!!!
He needs to have his political career arrested.
Nothing about this article makes any sense.
Haha and eww.
Now you just made MY head explode. Possibly both of them.
It's like picking up a random piece of gum that has already been chewed and placing it in your mouth while others look on in horror.
Holy shit 78 upmods and growing!!! You all need to pull away from the computer and get out!
Well, this story takes place in the future!  Otherwise, it is like many classes. Believe it or not, the school I've been working at was recently told by the state that we have too many kids classified as "special ed", and we need to get those numbers down or we risk losing funding.
I'm fairly certain Thompson doesn't meet those qualifications...
I have a battery powered wall clock too. Because of it I totally missed the new year (in Europe here) because it had decided to start to run out of power today! So I was happily gaming some and at what I thought was 23:45 there was a hell of a lot of noise outside so I was thinking 'wow what a bunch of idiots; they're 15 minutes early!'. Oh well, there'll be a next new year I guess.
Hypothesis: Secret signing statements exist that say "but this doesn't actually mean anything except when I say it does." :P
Odd coming from the NY times, which has one of the most pro-globalization editorial and op-ed staff around.
You wear a tinfoil suit, dontcha?
It's not their job to trim the debate fields.  
What does it mean, to be themed?
Having worked for numerous large banks I have this to say:  banks are cheap.  They always have been and always will be.  This article doesn't surprise me in the least.  There are many reasons to work or not work for an organization.  I find I do my job just as well when I don't have soap or paperclips.  Its not what drives me.   Many institutions remain effective being cheap bastards - year after year.  So they must be doing something right.
age? there is no age.  topic? how about...computing! i have a graduate degree in it after all....on full scholarship!
I wouldn't trust Bush with so much as a cotton ball.
Unfortunately in America it seems not enough people give a shit if their country is being overrun by morons.
Umm you can frame it that way if you want, but that would be generalizing. How about this: Live a little.
Just leave your wireless connection on and open. Thanks! Have a great time!
Just about anything has value in quantity.
It gets a lot worse... check out the "About Me" page.  http://www.zedshaw.com/index.html  &gt; I’ve studied every martial art and could kick a hole in the side of a car door. Even at 33 years old I’m still tougher than every nerd on the internet and will accept any challengers looking to prove themselves. In fact, if you talk shit to me and don’t back it up with a fight then you’re a pussy. Pure and simple. I could pimp you out as a $2 whore. You’re that weak.  He tries to play this as "tongue in cheek" but in reality he's just arrogant.
has to be. according to my knowledge of the subject.
perfect timing
Hey, don't worry.  Those execs are going to do just fine in fascist America.  What's everybody so excited about?
irony! so you're name is siddharth ahimsa? in the west, your equivalent name would be *Jesus Love*. 
Very unlikely you're going to see anything with Google Earth guys.  For one thing, the middle of the ocean is typically not at high-res, for another, these are not exactly solid masses, rather they are large coagulations of small material.
I'm staying in because I am a bitter antisocial nerd loser who blames all my problems on other people.
I should start a BDSM club, I mean they have BLGT groups all over the place- they watch Project Runway together every week or something. I'm not sure how I would advertise . . .
Have you, ah, been herded into a train car by a policeman recently?  Or known someone who has?  I call bullshit on your unwarranted hyperbole.
The plus symbols are automatically inserted by OpEdNews' program.  Not sure why.  I'll write to the owner of OpEdNews and ask.
a recursive response confirms it mostly.
Sorry about your friend. 
They lived at the bottom of a lake.
&gt;The whole beauty of moving to a digital world is that it eliminates distortion completely.  hasn't this guy heard of bit errors?
I wouldn't call Warren Buffets house a modest bungalow.  He lives in a 6,000 sq ft house.
oops.  s/her/hear
yes. though not to a puppet.
Seriously...immortality isn't all it's cracked up to be if that's the definition.
Hello, and Welcome to the Internet!  You'll find lots of valuable, questionable, and inappropriate material here.  Please watch the trolls on the right, they bite at any commentary whatsoever.  Remember to keep your anti-virus on at all times and enjoy the ride!
Mine should've been a reply to philoj actually, makes a little more sense that way. Also, Happy New Year, STFU!
Not really.
&gt; actual smart people don't have to tell people they're not stupid.   This is rich.  Go ahead.  Tell me you're not stupid.  I want to see this.
Corporate logos, awesome! We just don't see enough of them these days.
In a pluralistic society, there will be people with tinfoil hats, there will be people who use all lowercase, people who like to use italics, and omg people who like to use upper case.  Some of them will yell wolf when there is no wolf, and some of them will yell fire when there is a fire.  I think the most annoying thing about the guy is that for the most part he's right.  e.g. [NYT editorial today](http://www.google.com/url?sa=t&amp;ct=res&amp;cd=1&amp;url=http%3A%2F%2Fwww.nytimes.com%2F2007%2F12%2F31%2Fopinion%2F31mon1.html%3F_r%3D1%26oref%3Dslogin%26ref%3Dopinion%26pagewanted%3Dprint&amp;ei=XY95R7vXDI24epaDlTw&amp;usg=AFQjCNFXL61pF2V7fanNIMI8o1iNbnaMmw&amp;sig2=68XrpLdgdSfc0wVIR8KISw)  , [US is worst-ranking country re surveillance](http://www.privacyinternational.org/article.shtml?cmd%5B347%5D=x-347-559597), etc.
my forte.
Staying at home to watch a movie with my wife, we just put our young son to bed and we'll have a bottle of wine and be in bed by 11.
Unless you're in the steamroller business.  Then imitation is the highest form of **flattening**.  *[pause for laughter]*  *[those are cricket chirping]*  Thank you, thank you.  You're too kind.  I'm here all night.  All.  Night.  Enjoy the lobster.  Tip your waitress.
Could be the reason that a full page RP ad which had been purchased and paid for by a single suppertor and was to be run on Sunday, December 30th didn't get printed. 
Co-sponsored by Dennis Kucinich
enter a comment here
Duct tape and Sharpies.  That's all you need.
comment downvoted for being a crybaby reddit douchebag.
only stupid people celebrate anything.
Bullshit
yes. 
*"If I was a dick from the beginning of the stop, I apologize. I mean that with all sincerity. I am human. If I've dealt with 10 assholes before I stopped you or maybe delivered a death notification, I may have done the wrong thing and assumed you were gonna be one too."*  I really hope that by "one", he means "an asshole".
um, a drum Major. Beats running around dressed like a [Majorette](http://www.allreaders.com/pictures/rudy_giuliani_drag.jpg).  but they say he's an OK Mayor too.
Just FYI - it's "divert".  
agreed
These have to be fake. The "Vista is the Future" comment makes no sense except as mockery.
lets see if it means anything... and whether  Ron will be there
bank of america is pussies.
I tried getting it, but they were incompetent and getting support without a real number was near impossible.
Nicely put. I'll add this phrase to my list of excuses to why I work for an evil company.
One can not believe anything the Times prints. The New York Times is a dinosaur going extinct !
Ron Paul is pulling in closer to 100% of racists. That's his entire support base.
Of course, one possible workaround is simply using Control-Shift-C and Control-Shift-V for copy and paste.  This is how it's done in terminal emulators on GNU/Linux.  It's much more convenient that right-click-&gt;copy or right-click-&gt;paste.
it's why i want to escape.
bitches should be extracted from the leadership thing.
why?
&gt;why? if you criticize another country - you think you will be free to open your mouth without being told how much yours sucks?  Because it's boring and predictable and egocentric as hell.  The world doesn't start and stop with the US.   &gt;Typically American...bitch and moan - but cant take the truth about their fat lazy asses. Be glad that there are OTHER Americans here - who will tell you....get off your fat lazy ass and stop bitching about other countries.   Where do you get off making all these assumptions about how *I* feel about the US.  You're a fucking idiot.  First of all, I didn't "bitch and moan."  Secondly, just because the US happens to be fucked up, doesn't somehow absolve all other nations from criticism.  That's the stupidest argument I've seen since the last time I was on Reddit.  You people are pathetic.  You disgust me.  
The density of the garbage is actually so low that it wouldn't show up anyway.  These "continents" of garbage are actually areas of the ocean where the density of human waste is much higher than in other areas, but still not anywhere near high enough to form a contiguous mass of any appreciable size. This topic shows up on reddit every few months, and the comments are always about the same.
Somewhere on the ZDNet forum http://talkback.zdnet.com/5208-12355-0.html?forumID=1&amp;threadID=31199&amp;messageID=579066&amp;start=0 EDIT: My link doesn't seem to be working... Oh well. I've removed it and replaced it with text of the URL...
&gt; It's rather sad that the US used to lead the way in these issues When exactly did the US lead the way in political realism regarding its enemies, in reasoned diplomacy, or in rational reaction to foreign threats?  During the [Iran-Contra](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Iran-Contra_Affair) era?  Or earlier, during the Red Scare?  Perhaps even earlier, in a saner age, when the words of the founding fathers still lingered.  Perhaps during the turn-of-the-century [Philippine-American War](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Philippine-American_War), when the Filipino race in general were declared insurgents in their own country and the Philippines an American colony. On the other hand, while there are many foolish or self-serving conflicts into which the United States threw itself with a bizarrely senseless fervour, at least we may say that the United States stayed its hand and withheld action against Nazi Germany, while the rest of the Anglosphere acted.  Truly, there was a time when the United States chose its war policies with a rational wisdom found nowhere else on earth.
I've never seen any information on how long heat would be retained underground like that. I'm very curious.
No... Ahimsa was The Buddha's "motto" and it is apt that my name is "Siddhartha" without the "A" at the end.
fuck that stupid goddamned xtian pretard.
&gt;his poll numbers recently entered double-digits, and they continue to rise rapidly.  Did he buy your lie?
Excellent resource.  Thanks.  I've also pre-ordered the DVD.
I fuckin' love nerd drama, and now I fuckin' love Zed. TELL IT LIKE IT IS BRO
&gt; MS decides to make command windows be DOS compatibility layers, which causes side-effects like not being able to theme the window or not being able to drop objects onto it.  I think that's why there's [PowerShell](http://www.microsoft.com/windowsserver2003/technologies/management/powershell/default.mspx), an *actual* command line shell.
Reminds me of trying to play Super Mario World on the display model at Wal-Mart.  No, I was here first.  I've only been playing for five minutes.  Get away, kid.  I'm not kidding.  Get away.  Stop that.  Ok, fine, I give up.
exactly. Its sad how many of our own Americans now think its cool to kick out the immigrants...kinda says a lot about the direction of this country...  Ever see the film 'Idiocracy'  -- I think its coming true here.
I've always said that I wish him a long life, so that he can see himself go down in history as America's worst president and a blemish on humanity. I hope, one day, people laugh in his face.
I was going to say something bad about Huckabee, but I've decided that I shouldn't go negative.  Btw, I was going to say that Huckabee was a douchebag.
リアルでPay It Forwardしてますねー。すごい。
 How about a big cup of STFU?
Clue:  &gt;*"Bank of America chief Ken Lewis may have taken home $28 million, but he's still slashing wasteful perks such as free soup and crackers for employees."*
Anyone know which tribe would have been in that area at that time? I’m thinking the [Wusun](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Wusun)…
LOL!  Well said! 
I've already nearly been vomited on, so Happy New Rounding Error
tell him to fuck himself. 'we' don't need 'bransons'.
The lotteries are a tax on the mathematically challenged. What are ministries like the Copeland's?
ものすごーくデザインを作り込んだ書籍とかでは使えない技だけど、技術書にはかなりのブレイクスルーですね。
So, former military operatives trained by the US military, now working for Blackwater, can do (legal) work they couldn't do when they were working for the military?  Interesting.
you ARE an idiot AND a piece of shit.
another great carnival related to chronic pain - I don't know how this blogger does it
When you watch the video, the reporters started laughing immediately. It must be the highlight of a political reporters career to be present for moments like this.
Once you're comfortable with working your way around Ubuntu and find yourself rebooting into Windows less and less, I recommend you install something like VMWare on Ubuntu and run Windows inside that so that you can still use CAD (specialised applications like that will still require Windows, most of the time).
Wonder why?  All we got was shit like this:  http://www.rollingstone.com/news/story/17601363/the_100_best_songs_of_2007  No wonder nobody is buying records.  There's nothing decent to buy.
I don't think I understand the whole private security contractors thing. If these companies can provide their services at these rates for a profit, then surely that money could be just as effectively spent boosting the US military? The infrastructure is all in place already, so why can't they put that money directly towards recruiting more people / improving training programs / upgrading equipment / boosting soldier wages to attract more and better people?  So what's the deal? And why do I get the feeling I'm not going to like the answer?
Tough for you. It might have opened your eyes.
And Mr. Crabs is one HELLUVA boss! (Even if he's a greedy little bastard!)
my album purchasing has increased 100%! only a DIFFERENT genre.
Can you give a specific example?  Or set of examples?  It's always good to be skeptical (even of skeptics!)
There's nothing about that photo that makes it "clearly a designed shot" rather than a design rationalized by its admirers or considered by the artist in choosing the picture to present after the fact.  While the critics may have been photo pedants making tiny criticisms of the photo, the advocates were being art pendants making a show of their supposed art snobbery. It would seem that you favor the latter, given the supposed jibe of dogs playing poker.  At least the photo pendants are criticizing the photo on its own merit, in their own opinion, and not the assumption that it must be a great picture because of who took it. 
I doubt it makes much difference. It probably recycles the usual Romney attacks for hunting and immigration.
he rocks.
Ummm, so he's prescribing ideology to the problem then?  Because, you see, _everything_ is ideology, particularly when it comes to economics.
One man's evil is another man's righteousness.
I agree.  But the number of *hot* guys willing to  provide charm and romance and dash is limited.  And they're the ones who get the hot women.  When I read this article, I find that I picture this women as being attractive. A good antidote to this delusion is to visit the local supermarket, and look at what's available in aisle 35+. No way would I do it without a *lot* of pecuniary remuneration. There has to be a good reason, financial or bodacious,  for breaking out the scented candles and champagne flutes.
It's as if you took a pinch of dust to an olympic sized swimming pool and sprinkled it over the center in an area the size of a hot tub.   Somebody says "oh my god, there is a patch of dust the size of a hot tub in the middle of this swimming pool!"  While a true statement, it is nonetheless barely observable.
oooolllld
I can see Colbert delivering this perfectly. I wonder if those guys are sitting at home kicking themselves for not being on the air.
Yes reddit is pathetic and disgusting...its lovely isnt it? ;)  Happy new Year you whining bitching morons! 
Staying home tonight and dealing with about a dozen drunk idiots.  (They aren't idiots when sober...)
&gt;Of the many reports of false spam on Ron Paul, this article will track the announcement of his presidential run through his ideas.  This is how your children will write if you let Ron Paul destroy your school system.
Here’s a possibly relevant paragraph from the [Wikipedia entry on Lake Issyk Kul](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Issyk_Kul#History):  &gt; In pre-Islamic legend, the king of the Ossounes had donkey's ears. He would hide them, and order each of his barbers killed to hide his secret. One barber yelled the secret into a well, but he didn't cover the well after. The well water rose and flooded the kingdom. The kingdom is today under the waters of Issyk-Kul. This is how the lake was formed, so legend says. Other legends say that four drowned cities lie at the bottom of the lake; in fact, substantial archaeological finds have been made in shallow waters of the lake.
I think everyone recognizes that it was the viral aspect. I even want to see the ad now.
Arch Linux is great, it takes the KISS concepts of Slackware and bundles them with a good package manager(something Slackware lacks).
What's interesting is that I personally agree that all the candidates should be invited. But the problem is that Fox News is choosing "the frontrunners" based on nothing... Ron Paul polls higher than Fred Thompson and has probably raised more money this quarter than ALL of the Republican candidates combined. No matter how you look at it, Fox News is biased and should die immediately.
I just hear the ocean. 
Disease control with knockout genes, possible higgs-bozon detection in the LHC, or visual detection of extra solar planets.
I realize that (nlj) means "non-linkjacked", but would it hurt to spell out the word completely instead of using an OAUA (obscure and unknown acronym)?
Well, technically, he said Jerusalem... and the Mormon Spokesperson said New Jerusalem...
Not me, I'm gonna be a drunk smart-ass.
&gt; and the parking lot is paved with handjobs.  Can't they afford blowjobs?
Next thing you know, we'll hear that non-white immigrants aren't interested in **[curling](http://www.curling.ca/)**...
Dude, it's new year's eve, so I just gotta say...  Enjoy what you're smoking.  It's obviously having some effect.  Happy new year.
No matter how much of a neocon some of these election officials may be, many of them are afraid of being caught and going to jail for election fraud. The smart ones will bring back the paper ballots to prevent themselves from being taken away in handcuffs down the road. 
&gt;When was the last time you invited him to stay in your own home?!  Last year. Satisfied?
goddamned xtian pretards.
Lets see ww1 and ww2 come first to mind. I also think that France choose a republic because of the American experiences and didn't just continue the monarchy.
I don't know anything about how these signals are encoded, but I would assume there is some error correction built in (eg parity, hamming,..).
Maybe I can actually find a job now!
Yeah, calling them "continents" is akin to comparing our own asteroid belt to a *Halo- like ringworld.*
I never read that.  What the hell is it about?
LiberalDemocrat is a moron.
fuck them. they are the poster child for parasites.
there are girls on xbox live?
I'm not suggesting these things are neccessary for morale. Just that taking them away causes morale to suffer. It doesn't matter how trivial the little bauble was...if you had it at one point, and then they take it away, morale suffers. If where you work never had that stuff, then so be it. Thats what you're used to. But if they took it away...bad juju.
I'd like to know what Ron Paul have to say about this.
called this one correctly about Huckabee - don't go hunting or you'll look like a Kerry
No, not, and certainly seem to stand out the most in that sentence. They are very dramatic words. One no and three nots, High drama.
Obviously Huckabee is going to go bankrupt early in the primaries, he has barely the money nor the support of Ron Paul. What I am concerned about is Huckabee taking his anger out in a violent fashion as I don't consider him to be a mentally stable individual. 
Being apparently an important geographic location throughout the times, it's not weird to find all kinds of stuff from different cultures, not necessarily from the same time.  It does sound like the press release is a bit overenthusiastic (stunning! tremendous!) so anything said should probably be taken with a grain of salt pending more info.
They all strike me as having been written by the same person.  
Yeah, me too. I'd never vote for Huckabee anyway, but I still want to see the ad. Anyone have it?
In Japan nobody goes out on New Year's Eve (although Christmas Eve is a popular time to go out for couples). Almost everywhere is closed, so there isn't much choice. It's already Jan 1 here, so happy 2008 all.
This is a dump. The resolution isn't good enough to show you that there is actually trash mixed in with the soil and there is trash all around the surrounding area because this is a *very very* windy area. People come at night and throw trash over the fence that surrounds it or drop off many large items along the roadsides that surround it like furniture. You can't really pick any of it out, but I assure you it's all there.
We just had our Linux Productivity Suite.
If you read the comments on the article, a commenter says the driver recalled an Allstate Insurance commercial, NOT Mythbusters.   @sense5: Don't post articles making claims that have no evidence.
I don't see why you're being downmodded.  It's obviously from your previous comment in this thread that you just made a joke.
They probably are, compared to him, in his chosen domain of expertise.  I don't know if you've spent much time in the corporate world, but watching those non-technical 'morons' try to manage a technical project is painful. They aren't really 'risk-taking entrepreneurs', so much as middle managers.
Wow, your dog eats better than I do
Duh. Microsoft added break-edit-continue to VB back in 90's.  And there's no prove that it cannot be run in anything but Lisp; it just hasn't been done. I'd be interested in seeing how this works out.
I can hardly believe it.
220K. I had 125K to put down... I saved all of that money by driving 20 year old cars.
 +----------+  |  PLEASE  |  |  DO NOT  |  | FEED THE |  |  TROLLS  |  +----------+   |  |    |  |     .\|.||/.. 
I don't think it is fair to say you won't find a cool woman at a bar. I meet them there all the time and it isn't for one night stands. In fact, over the weekend, my friend and I brought two girls back to my apartment...to play Rock Band!
&gt;Ron Paul is a racist turd.
we will be at home...
Retracted by whom?
Let me know how that works out? Ron Paul is a racist turd.
&lt;3 Radiohead. Yorke can do no wrong in my eyes, even laugh.
That comment is exactly how I feel. I still hate you anyway.
I notice that [Boo](http://boo.codehaus.org/) doesn't seem to get much love around here. Any fans of Python syntax + static typing?
OLD.  In more ways than one.
Maybe I'm providing outsourcing services to US clients.  Oops.
If Congress didn't keep extending copyright, a newer version of Websters would be out of copyright and available on the dict servers.
Also.. it's "Don't", not "DONT".
While you have a point, I think the person following orders does have a certain responsibility to execute orders responsibly? Redditors are quick to point out that soldiers in iraq doing MDK for the bush administration have a certain amount of culpability. Granted, this analogy is a huge stretch, but I think there is something there.
Shit-ton is actually the imperial equivalent to the metric Grizznip.  Shit-ton = 2.2 Grizznips
[citation needed]
Vote down if you live in Australia and you're already getting over your NY's hangover :)
&gt;I see no evidence of him being a professional.  Well then, you haven't been paying attention. Ron Paul is a racist turd.
flu != herpes
Nah, longbowmen have lousy defense.
Ban you! Racist turd!
Or, to quote Bukowski, "Sartre's Farts."
I have read through this article, as well as the links people have provided so far in the comments here.  Most of the articles seem to have the same initial source.  Right now, there does not seem to be enough evidence to say that there is really an advanced civilization there or not. So, right now the logical thing to do seems to be to wait for more and better evidence.  Right now, I wouldn't yet class this as some grand new discovery.  Maybe it is, but there seems to be more than enough room for doubt at this point in time.  
you need proof and sources that hes not
These are not simply immigrants... They are illegal immigrants people who leech off of our economy and government and return nothing. If they were legal documented workers everyone would be perfectly fine with that. 
I just an idiot drunk or sober
Paul should meet one of those at least.
type fast, make mistakes.
I have had (in person) contact with Zed once, and he was never anything but pleasant, polite, intelligent, and funny.
Do you have a source on that machine?  I thought plastic was a byproduct of oil being refined.  That would be like distilling the sugar out of your coffee, and then saying you can turn the sugar back into coffee with microwaves.
What do you mean where's its ninety six dollars pound pound ninety six and head????
You're right about AQ in X.  But bin Ladin's AQ is (or was) an actual organization.  Which has been hit hard by the War on Terror.  Of course, we can't declare victory because somewhere there still exists 'Terror', thus, the endless crisis.  You're overall attitude is exactly right: AQ is way overrated.
I use a keyboard!
ITS **WAR CRIMES** NOT **GRAMMAR DIVERSIONS**
BREAKING: He'll run the negative ad, but changed the closing tagline:   "I'm Mike Huckabee, and I disapprove of this message". 
The question is, really, why do open governments need FOI laws? Almost everything the gov't does could easily be online and nicely organized, from tax revenue to every single expenditure, including military ones.
THIS IS BULLSHIT, WTF IS THIS SHIT
Yeah, I remember it from the last time I saw it.  It just occurred to me this time that hey, if there are pieces as big as refrigerators, we ought to be able to see at least some of them at the highest resolutions typically available on Google Maps.  Sadly, that was not the case.
Fogo de Chao, just down the street, is awesome too.  Waiter told me they serve 7 tons of meat a week.  
The website is pretty poorly designed -- leaves one fishing around for any sort of context, not only regarding this article, but even regarding what the company's products do.
But just think how strong your thumbs will be! Finally they can match the sheer strength of your right wrist!
AMERICA IS TURNNIG INTO A POLICE STATE
If the military does something wrong, the government gets the blame.  If a defense contractor does something wrong...eh.  In theory, the economic justification would be that defense contractors compete and can be swapped out (there's no substitute Blackwater) and they can be dropped when there's less need for resources and the company can go elsewhere (which means that Blackwater would be fighting for the highest bidder elsewhere in the world).  Might work for some forms of government contracting, but not very helpful for defense contracting.
Some masterpieces are different from others.  Some are readily accessible to the general viewer, and others require deeper knowledge to appreciate.  True, maybe many people would walk by this shot hanging in a gallery, but a photographer who had actually attempted to take similar shots and realized the level of difficulty involved in achieving such a shot would not pass it by lightly.  Nearly all of HCB's shots are that way, which is why his work is instantly recognizable to educated photographers, and why he is considered a master.  You simply cannot duplicate his work.
Slight nitpick:  It's version 7.10 and not 7.1 - that is, it's not a decimal number.  7 is for the year 2007, and 10 is for the month October.  It's a little annoying, I admit, but a small price to pay for what I think is a freaking awesome Linux distribution.  Dive right in and explore.  Just be extra cautious when anything asks for your password after you login; this is usually done to elevate your access temporarily for a system task like installing software or starting the auto self-destruct.  (Look up "sudo" for more information.)
Ouch!
Oh, I plan on that right after midnight. Then he's all mine :)
Oddly enough, I started using Linux by running in over windows on Virtual PC. 
i can has democracy?
I agree with a lot you say, and, I do find Reddit to be a mixed bag: Trash &amp; Treasure!  I still feel you should post your own articles and comments to both contribute and help redress the balance.  While there is a very coarse mix of stories and comments, I actually like to read the various posts and viewpoints and simply skip over the more asinine twitterings.   However, many times someone has produced a surprising angle on a story which would never have occurred to me, if I was left to my own devices.  Like they say, there's always 3 (or more) sides to a story.
What the evil sneaky catch?
r maybe you're missing the point.   Again, all art is suggestive. The critics are judging the work itself, and stating what they don't like and perhaps how they would have done this shot. Their expertise would only be demonstrated by getting the shot they wanted by the means they proposed, thus showing they do know something about *photography,* if not famous works of art.  You would imply yourself to be an expert of photography because you can cite the artist of the photograph, and then dismiss their opinions of the work merely because they aren't engaged in the proper respect/hero worship of the artist. Knowing the artist doesn't make one an expert in photography, tho it may speak for having some knowledge of famous photo art work.   &gt;They're making themselves out to be expert photographers brimming with knowledge which simply must be passed on, while at the same time exposing their ignorance in a most embarrassing fashion.  ANd this is complete BS. They posted the pic on flickr for comment. What ignorance is exposed is of art snobbery, not of photography, and of what they value as art, as it is, again, a subjective value to the individual.   IMO, of course.
i'm staying at someone elses home so they can deal with me and a few other drunken idiots. 
All I've see are **grammar crimes**.
&gt;Hilariously, some Paulbots are claiming that the Ron Paul Political Report wasn't written or edited by, well, Ron Paul. That the piece in question was written by a staffer. If so, was a retraction printed in a subsequent edition of the newsletter? If not, the excuse doesn't fly.
Emacs is one of the most portable editors in the world, Emacs.Net will probably just run officially on Windows.  Emacs is lightweight compared to other editors that offer a subset of its features.  Microsoft are well known for their too-bloated software.  Emacs can be used without a graphical interface or a mouse; name a Microsoft application that can.  Emacs is fully extensible in Lisp, a language with few limits (though Emacs Lisp has some pretty annoying limitations.)  What will Microsoft use to extend this new Emacs.Net?  Emacs has unusual, but likable key bindings.  Emacs autosaves your files to make sure you don't lose any information in a crash.  How many times have you heard someone say they lost their Word document because the computer crashed?  Call it an extensible or programmable editor, but they're not building Emacs, no way.  
Careful bourgeois, there's many more of us proletarians...
How so?  (Police work?)
I wonder how much they are really leeching off this nation in comparison to the corrupt officials we have in our congress and government... ?  Id love to compare the real economics of illegal immigrants working at low wage jobs and using some social services vs the amount of cash flow blown by our faulty leaders and corrupted corporate robbers...  We should talk to some economists about the comparative effects...that might put things in perspective.
Drunk idiot voting down!
Maybe if they werent so fucking stupid to know what not to eat...they would be fine.
Thinking about taking the GRE Psychology Subject Test.  Read this and find out what sort of stuff you need to know.
 +------------------------+  |      |  |  Please...    |  |      |  | Don't feed the trolls. |  |      |  +------------------------+     ||     ||     ||     ||   &amp;  || /    \ &amp;  \ ||/\&amp;  \// \\||//\\/
At least the article is aware that Godwin's Law is descriptive, not prescriptive, and thus can no more be repealed than can the law of gravity.
Cant make up my mind, Help me please.
Reddit is not your personal army?
lol exactly sorry 'bout my math skillz
They do not allow a direct deposit from a commercial account to a personal account at another bank and that is driving me crazy.  It does not surprise me they skimp on the soap.  Bastards!
smoking is banned here in Queensland, Australia at &gt; pubs, clubs, restaurants and workplaces, as well as in commercial outdoor eating and drinking areas and in outdoor public places (e.g., patrolled beaches, children's playground equipment, major sport stadiums, and within 4 meters of non-residential building entrances) i used to work as a glassy at a nightclub when there was no ban. i remember gasping for air at the airconditioner. i suppose these new laws are a good thing
Goooooo Mythbustores!
Sheer, red, low-cut.  You're welcome!
Is it just me or is Florida devolving the fastest of all the states recently?
Then they came for me...  (Oh, now that makes sense...)
&gt;According to Moore the trash accumulates the same way bubbles clump at the center of hot tub  The way I get rid of bubbles in a hot tub is by pulling the plug, anyone know where the plughole of Earth is?
oscar peterson - you'll be remembered!
Yeah, with the intelligence of a pavement tile.
I agree; but an officer exercising his discretion in deciding whether or not to ticket someone for a bylaw offense *is* being responsible so long as there is actually evidence of an infraction. They're given the authority to make a judgement call; and it's completely natural that a cop would be more lenient towards someone who is dealing with them honestly, fairly, and civilly, than one who is irate and abusive towards them.  Now if an officer is shown to be consistently favoring whites over blacks/hispanic, then there's cause for investigation &amp; discipline.  I'm not talking about anything along the lines of police brutality/assault, or making up charges/offenses where there isn't one. I read the statement above: "Our state has over 5000 traffic laws, I can find one to help you get over your tude." as meaning that he is willing to overlook many minor infractions; but if someone's giving him a hard time, he'll hold you to the letter of the law. Not that he'd make up non-existent infractions. That's supported by what he says at the end: "Im still a nice guy, treat me like one and you might just get a warning."  There are good cops and bad cops. They're not all taser-happy thugs who don't understand civil rights or due process. And the good ones want to avoid unnecessary hassles as much as the rest of us.
So it would have been okay if they were at a shooting range? Weird.
So until you seize the capital building nobody can go to war against you?  Tell that to the 'official forces' of pretty much every civil war in history.  Few of them recognized their rebels as a state, but all of them considered themselves to be at war against them (though perhaps with a formal declaration as such). I didn't say that I agreed with calling the fight against organized crime a war, I answered your question, '...When we cracked down on the Mafia in the United States, did we call it "The War on Organized Crime"?'  You're welcome.
23%
Post pics and we'll decide
 import os  import nukes    while(True):   nukes.launch()   os.fork()
They might be referring to Pope Gregory IX's antics.
Which parts caused you trouble?
Made famous by selling all of the phosphates on their island in what may be the most fantastic splurge in history.
PBR is the king of cheap beers. That doesn't mean that I don't try to get nice stuff when I can afford it, because I do. (It helps that I am a lightweight, so one eight-dollar sixpack can carry over two nights, or a night and a bit of tomorrow.) But in terms of cheap stuff when you've got no money or you're stocking up for a party - give me PBR over Nati Light or Keystone or Bud, any day.   (And yeah, fuck hipsters.)
I will be one of the so called drunk idiots.
Lovely -- I have got to get more sensitive eyes!
Any more than one is a waste and will break faster.
Not really.  For one, I wasn't talking to you or about you.  I wasn't claiming no one did that or that no one was that generous.  Only that whatever gripe this guy has with golf is unwarranted. How do you feel about *golf*?
Awsome ! Somebody had to blow up the bubble, sorry rails no more magic, just another clean MVC framework idea with a refreshing language and a tired Web-CRUD-coders community willing to beleive in magic, the rest is marketing, self-promotion, gurus, Php refugees... Zed comming out is an event in Rails short history
The comments in the article indicate that PowerShell suffers from the same problem as CMD.EXE
"...is a bit harsh"  Not really.  Such "entrepreneurs" floated braindead through the same public school we did.  They aren't supermen.
Apparently, a Fogo de Chao recently opened in Austin. I've only heard good things. 
No, you misunderstand. His particular religion uses masterbation as its devotional.
Icanhascheezbu**g**ger?
Just because your life sucks does not mean everybody outside your house is a drunk idiot.
I loved the scary ending: "You must now report to your local police station for a drug test." I wonder how long it will be before that type of threat becomes enforceable? 
There have been a ton of links having something to do with Mario that also had good graphics, any speculation on a new game coming out?  A few of the links I'm talking about: http://www.geekstir.com/evolutionofmario.html?category=gaming/the-evolution-of-mario/ http://cutlassimages.com/content/view/60/ http://uploader.ws/upload/200701/emrocamariolanddesktop3oe4sg.jpg http://www.rob-sheridan.com/sketchblog/pics/mario2-wallpaper1.jpg
Interesting point. I keep coming back to you calling your friend a "moron," though. :D
Sire! The peasants are revolting!
This is for you reddit: http://www.jisto.com/index.php?j=xjgre
what's a million people between friends?  (no-one say the worlds biggest orgy) Its interesting and sad as a foreigner to watch americans thrashing around over this.  I always thought the impeachment thing with clinton was  quite overwrought;  he lies once over something that is pretty much insignificant and is gutted.  Bush?  Made of teflon, apparently;  Why can't the democrats get their act together on this, or rather why is it that they don't want to get their act together? (I know, I know, Kuchinich.  Thats great, but very much in the minority) Do they feel that initiating impeachment proceedings would undermine their electability?  what do they think people voted them into congress for?   
No, because killing someone for possible future actions would be wrong.
old news 
How are the democrats going to win elections if this keeps up ?
It can, actually.  It's just not economical or easy to do so, so we don't.
According to the article:  * The plant generates "about 30 million kilowatt-hours of electricity annually" * "Nellis is agreeing to buy the power for 20 years at about 2.2 cents/kWh" * The plant cost $100,000,000 * "None of the $100 million cost came from the Air Force"  30,000,000 KWh/year * 0.022 dollars/KWh = 660,000 dollars/year  So either:  * The numbers in the article are wrong, * the solar panels will stop working long before SunPower gets its investment back, or * some other entity not mentioned is the article is helping to foot the bill.
&gt;At least until someone makes The Ron Paul Game.  [It could happen](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Shadow_President).
It's not ironic -- this is a law that Congress insisted upon, and that Bush didn't want to be seen vetoing.
genetic discoveries will be at the forefront, imo, along with research on old age afflictions (cell regeneration for failing joints) and increased understanding of the brain...those are just to start
What's the point?  To see Ron Paul stand there and not get any questions I guess.  Even if Fox invites him, they aren't going to let anyone address him.  Or if they do, it'll be like the question Denis Kucinch was asked at the last debate, to talk about one of the other candidates.  If the Ron Paul fans want to keep pitching him as the anti-candidate, I personally think it helps their cause that Fox continue to exclude him from stuff like this.
perky? =&gt; sheer red low cut. Nice ass? =&gt; tight black.
Apparently, after a little bit of research that you spurred me to, it looks like the motion for both was defeated.  http://www.cbc.ca/arts/story/2005/07/28/ipodlevy050728.html
Always go for the red dress.
right. so if someone says they are atheist, my interpretation is that one interprets that to mean they dont believe in god, not that they believe in the non-existence of god. Maybe its a very tiny difference, and probably insignificant.  My feeling is that belief requires active commitment in some way, which suits the hardline atheist types but excludes those who simply don't care about religious matters and have no conception of a higher being.
&gt; but it's just not in the same class from a power user perspective.  It depends. I personally can't stand VS' bloatness but I know many good developers who don't want to bother coding their own extensions nor get excited about modifying their editor's code in real time (they built the preferences window for a reason). VS has all the batteries included, and its default is sane enough you can start working immediately. Me, I'm not going anywhere without my dotemacs.  &gt; This is not called "powerful", but rather "specialized"  Yeah, because Visual Studio is an *integrated* development environment. It specializes in *something*, namely the .NET framework. When it comes to debugging a running C# app with 50+ modules, VS gives you REPL and watcher and breakpoint and real-time code modification and whatnots while Vim is totally a joke.  &gt; where is smart tabbing in VS?!?  It's enabled by default since 2003. Know your tools.
Screw it. I say the candidates not invited just show up and stage their own debate outside. See which one gets more people watching.
Some of what he says is right, but it's the delivery that I can't get past.  And the repetition.  So I ignore him.
I don't mind (FWIW) attitude in a competent and confident guy/gal , but attitude is really tedious in total posers the likes of which the rails community seems to suffer from a lot. But seriously, Ruby community proper couldn't have been more different, and good for them. I hope the rails titanic doesn't take the good name of Ruby down with it too.
conform...Conform....CONFORM!!!
Huckabee ignores lots of things...like the entire bill of rights
Its not my mother Russia....  Im from the good ol USA - born in Texas to make it even worse! Im just giving back where its deserved...Insulting those who insult! ;)   Plus Ive been to Russia....and I liked it.  Happy New Year.
I know, I just hate crap like this.   It's just hard to find good art now, that isnt being used to endorse a product. It would be nice to just see art. 
Ouch. Busted.
The worst thing is when you're good at what you do and you find yourself in the midst of one of these "trending down towards bankruptcy" type places because they can linger longer than a gutshot Taliban fighter.
John Coltrane has been dead for 30 years, Miles Davis has been dead for 16 years. I don't think they need your support to make more music anymore. Just download the stuff.
Especially outsourcing our national security to foreign firms. Like firms based in Israel.
A bit late now, but you should have her neutered. We already have too many cats as it is.
Actually, I happened to buy the Monterey Jazz Festival recording of Davis.  Turns out I only supported the RIAA with half of my purchases.  I am pleasantly surprised.
What the hell is this doing in NSFW?
He's actually considered by many as New York City's greatest mayor. Not my opinion but the opinion of many of those cited publications in that very article (of course Greenwald will not cite them as it weakens his argument).  As for voting for the war, well that was a long time ago and since 2004 I think the majority disagrees now and even Bloomberg has since pulled out of the Republican party.
Ah excellent! The industry re-invents yet another 10+ year old wheel! The Gods, they are cruel.
Yeah I was just watching The West Wing and was amazed by the forsight that show had.  I'm seeing in the last 2 seasons parallels in real life that are mind boggling.  I especially enjoyed the live broadcast NBC did with the one episode of the debates between Alan Alda and Jimmy Smitt's charaters.  And in that show they also dealt with the media trying to squeeze out Smitt's in the early runnings.  Great show whom I'm proud to say clearly had some vision of the future of politics. I'm so surprised that Fox news, the supposed "fair and balanced" people would choose to exclude Mr. Paul who CLEARLY is the Repub. front runner.  That has shown me that I clearly cannot trust MSM to give me intel for a good decision.  I've as such from today forward removed all RSS and bookmarks linking to Fox news and I'd encourage anyone else to do the same.  I'm glad that the Chair has the balls to smack around Fox like this though.  It shows me that the American public at large and by whole mass conscienceness is fed up with bad candidates.  Thank god.  I voted GW in the first, and I didn't vote in the second.  GOd help me, I just couldn't bring myself to vote for Gore.  I just didn't think he had the irons in him to be a good president.
Actually, I'm not. But I'm giving the brother an amen. Many people who aren't lonely are not happy, ergo happiness doesn't necessarily follow companionship.
C-C-C-COMBO BREAKER!!!
I agree with Zed--there's a lot of shitty jobs out there you want to avoid if possible.
clever software could variate introductions.
That's good, but not reliable.  USB drives have a tendency to fail, especially if they're hard drives with moving parts.  I do a full backup to a staging area (a separate 350 GB hard disk in the server that I installed just for backups,) and verify the backup against the server.  Then I copy the backup from the staging area to a USB hard drive, and compare the two copies.  That way if one hard drive fails, then I know the other copy is good.  Full backups on Saturday, incremental backups the other days, and on Fridays I change the USB drive.  I cycle through a pool of three USB drives, all stored off-site.  
whats with the weird comment on the normal link?
Thanks.
But as an admin, I *expect* `cmd.exe` to work as "a regular console", and don't care about backwards compatibility with pre-Win32 stuff. Besides, what about Windows x64? It doesn't have a 16-bit subsystem at all, and yet its command prompt's architecture is still equally retarded.
"The scientists even checked their sample was representative of India as a whole in terms of class, religion and urban and rural dwellers."  I wander if they found a difference in penis size based on those variables.
I'm already blind with hairy palms, brothah.
&gt;And a good portion of us could care less.  You mean USC alums and PAC-10 homers?
It's on all kind of chicks here - Latina, white, Asian, the works.
I know that, but my mother (who I bought the CDs for) really likes having the physical object she can put into a machine.
Getting close to $20 million, but we're not there yet.  http://www.ronpaulgraphs.com http://www.ronpaul2008.com/donate
Welcome! We call this place internet.
Upmod. I haven't had to quarter any soldiers yet but we'll see what 2008 brings.
Where I can find one of those?
I don't care if her name is Carol Burnett, she's fuckin hot!
&gt; What's stupid is letting people who are a lot richer, and not necessarily smarter than you, walk all over you. To sit back and let them oppress you and decide who will become the president of the free world and completely ignore your pleas for change.  And you think you can prevent that by giving your hard-earned money to candidates that can't win?
"Brethren, please turneth to page 27 of thoust Playboy so that we mayest worship together in a circle."
&gt;Both teams colours are very similar  You can't tell the difference between [burnt orange](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Burnt_orange#Burnt_orange) and [cardinal](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Cardinal_(color\))?
Dear dumb schmucks.  President Roosevelt supported communist Russia in WWII.   Zzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzz ...
Reference?
Childish?  Whoo yeah, but also some insights in there.
Because you have display links with a reddit toolbar checked under preferences?  Of course that just pushes the question back.
This very interesting. I actually found there were more library bindings for Lisp than Haskell and more working example programs for Lisp. In particular, you cited using OpenGL from C. Well, I've had a fair go at using OpenGL (and GTK) from Haskell and found it almost impossible to get the trivial demos working let alone write anything useful myself. In particular, anything non-trivial runs far too slowly and there is no information about optimizing Haskell code. Occasionally a genius will turn up and optimize your code for you but can't explain how they did it. In fact, you stated that your interests are practical and that led you to Haskell but I also had a go at finding practical software written in Haskell only to find a single program (darcs) which is just a rip-off of CVS used almost exclusively by Haskellers. 
Tight black. Or at least, that's what I would go for, if I weren't going to a party where there will be more video games and cheap beer than sexy dresses and cocktails.  (I hope, because otherwise I'm terribly underdressed.)
I really seriously wanted to play with Boo, but the fact that it's DotNet-only was a drawback.  We currently get a lot of code reuse between IronPython and CPython.
Did they find the dinosaurs with saddles?
The fact that she was shot contradicts the fact that she was killed by the explosion?  How exactly is this a contradiction?  Not every shot is fatal. And after an explosion has done its work, I'm not going to trust a reddit interpretation of a youtube video to be the conclusive last word on the subject. Again, where is the contradiction? Not that I care about your answer... it's a rhetorical question.
I'm gonna have fun being someone else's problem!
&gt; more like their dick in yours  Ouch. I don't think my urethra would much care for that.
That's the spirit! 
I wish I was one of the drunken idiots. Instead I'm stuck at home sick :(
The guy with the comment at the top of this thread (natron) can just lift his manboobs up for that.
My understanding of Godwin's Law is that in a long enough timeline of all threads that the chances of Hitler/Nazis not being mentioned approaches zero. This does not mean that the argument that the person is trying to make is invalid.
Say what you will, but RoR sold a shit ton of books for Dave Thomas.
More Americans will discover that the earth is older than what it says in the bible. 
Bruce Wayne becomes BATMAN?!!
I wish people would stop worshipping the Constitution like it was holy writ. Were we to fashion a new one from scratch, we'd most certainly alter it substantially.
That's not true, unions are just as important to avoid spontaneous strikes as to plan deliberate ones. I know that they're willing to agree for, for example, a significant downsizing of the labour force if circumstances demand it.
wait how did American lead the way in WW1 and WW2? We came in rather late in both of those issues. Actually scratch that what issues is the original guy talking about? I'm just confused all around by all of this. Are we talking about "war on terror", or geo-political  non-interference, or like a refusal to fall for scare tactics/propaganda or something else all together.
You have thousands of drunk idiots in your home?  Or do you refer to commenting on reddit?
Good.  Maybe she could be talked into doing Bush.
I like to shop late at night, so Walmart wins that battle for me.
I appreciate Zed's forthrightness and candor.  It is refreshing--as long as he is correct.  He stepped out on a limb.  If he is correct, I value him more highly.  If he is terribly wrong, then it looks *real* bad.  It contrasts with a slightly-positive restaurant review that made an average restaurant sound ok, but when I actually visited, I understood how to reinterpret the "faint praise" review.  I would rather the reviewer not write the review at all if he does not have the guts to give a negative opinion.  Zed has stated his negative opinion and I take it as a warning:  Watch out for where Ruby is headed.  Watch carefully your consulting experiences.
Negotiation skill is a key element for any business to succeed. A good negotiator has to possess some virtues which helps him to succeed.
This is one of those pollution stories that is worth paying attention to. There is no complicated science or political bullshit, it's just animals dieing because people are throwing their crap out in the sea. Even Christians have to admit it.
You can't tell the difference between [burnt orange](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Burnt_orange#Burnt_orange) and [cardinal](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Cardinal_(color\))?
Oh, how I hope so.
Can you post a pic on reddit?
this is disturbing - so the big bully gets his way because no one will challenge him?  this isn't not going to last long.  one good lawyer anxious to make a name for him/herself will put a stop to this.
&gt;Greenpeace says embracing the three Rs - reduce, re-use and recycle - would help tackle the problem. Plastic recycling is lagging well behind paper and cardboard. Part of the reason is because many people aren’t even sure what recycling options exist in their area. But there are other challenges for plastic recycling too. Some plastics release toxic chemicals into the atmosphere, and are more expensive to recycle than to simply create a new product from petrochemicals. Utterly silly.  Recycling will not help with the problem.  Anyone who is conscientious enough to recycle will not be dumping trash on the beach anyway.  The real problem is that small portion of the population that *does* dump trash on the beach.
Oh my, what if I'm perky and have a nice ass both?
I've hired  strippers before at my restaurant. Very bad for business. Very good for entertaining the employees and I. Very dumb, very nasty, very easy. I need to add that I did not know they were strippers until after I hired them. They don't put that on their application and when you own a restaurant, your choices are limited.  Yea I hired them to work there. I've had over 200 employees in the 20 some years I was in the business. I've seen it all.
Please ban the spambots who commented below:
&gt;that ugly burnt orange stuff.  Aggy or land-thief?
look, mate; it has nothing to do with the word 'nurturer' but rather to do with the sexist stereotype you just outlined...  some women are very family centred, yes.  as are some men.  some don't give a monkeys one way or the other about it. Your rhetoric to me smacks strongly of the cult of motherhood/womanhood from back in the day. I dunno, maybe im whipped, eh?
“Therefore, the New Hampshire Republican Party calls upon all media organizations planning pre-primary debates or forums for both parties to include all recognized major candidates in their events.”   Deck chairs; Fox doesn't consider him to be a major candidate.
me too!!
We get it.  You think you're hilarious.  Go back to freerepublic.
oh my oh my
&gt;The thing to do is to profit from Paul and Huckabee. They are crazy. Bats in the belfry, barking mad on crank crazy. The people who support can be divided into two groups: barking mad insane gold bugs, evangelicals and greed headed meglomaniacs, who are completely beyond any discourse, simply because this is their religion, not their politics, and the people who will fall away as soon as there is an alternative presented in clear and reasonable terms.
It takes a while for the investigation to be done, and for the facts to be checked. Just because the government, or some people who work for the government, made an initial statement (or several) about what they think happened, doesn't mean they can't learn new facts and revise what they say. Get over it. And you don't know why the prevented an autopsy. Neither do I. There's no need to jump to conclusions about their reasons.
No it's worse than that Bush said "if your not with us then you are with the terrorist", meaning that not only you hate the U.S. government; you will/do participate in causing wide spread terror in American society, with which we will *have* to retaliate according to the Powell doctrine of overwhelming force.   About time we took the war to those damn redcoats /sarcasm
Just get over your tude, dude.
[http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Flattery](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Flattery)
WRONG
So where you from then? If its so more advanced - cough it up!!  and as for hating? I dont hate you - Im just giving back what you gave...you said - "It would be nice if Russia still had an advanced civilization." - and I assume you thought that was a great joke? ;)   Makes me wonder how far from your parents house you've ever travelled.  Armchair civilization scientist from USA!
"Layer" is not a misspelling.  You fail.
I've gone out for the past several years. This time, I decided that I'd rather not spend New Years with a bunch of obnoxious morons in a standing-room-only bar full of cigarette smoke and godawful music.  Instead, I'm at home drinking some very nice beers (Dogfish Head 120 Minute IPA at the moment), so that in a few hours when my steak is well-marinated, I won't mind standing out in the cold to grill it.   Between that and the Futurama marathon, I think it'll be more enjoyable than my past 5+ New Years, combined. 
"Highly validated" either means the same thing as "fact" or it doesn't.  Those are the only two choices.  It doesn't.  Evolution is a theory.  Educate yourself.
I can't provide a reference for this, but it's what I've heard.  If you get the right kind of rock and heat it up, it will release inert gas.  So you could get your fire going, throw a bunch of these rocks in there with it and when they start hissing (or whatever it is they do), you know you've got an atmosphere you can work in.  It wouldn't be hard to discover this kind of thing.  If you're working with a metal that gets corroded when exposed to oxygen and heat, and one day you use one of these special rocks in your forge or as an auxiliary of some sort, and noticed that you've got less corrosion to scrub off when you're done...
&gt;Everyone knew it then and made fun of it.  No kidding. I'm a little too young to have been around during Reagan's presidency, but I have several Doonesbury comic collections from that time period that totally lambaste Reagan for his senility.
It's called "jaded cynicism".
Most familiar triple is pour/poor/pore? What has the author been smoking? It's their/there/they're!
&gt;...how much did you pay for it? My '91 Geo Prism Sorry, but I had to stop right there.  I laughed.  Totaled it and miss it.  Laughed for all the good memories of it.  it's not everyday someone refers to that make and year.
Ugh, they're alliance, typical.  /spit
Everyone I hate likes it and everyone I like hates it, my path is clear.
Or, one other possibility:  perhaps Zed is correct that there is a lot of badness floating around the IT consulting marketplace.
Did you also tell her that artists can include artwork of a nearly unlimited size and detail with their music at nearly zero distribution cost when it's a digital download?
True, but the implication of invoking the law is that the Nazi remark was inevitable. Being inevitable, it is discounted, devalued, and assumed discredited. The law has evolved into a tool used to stigmatize an opponent's argument as unreasoned.
But he still supported Lieberman and Bush. To many of us, it was evident that Bush was a blathering imbecile way back in 2000.
Well, in that case, I agree.  There's absolutely no excuse for this.
You don't count on mutations that way.  If there was energy in plastic, we probably would have found a way to extract it, and people would actually *want* to recycle plastic because it would be worth money.
Here's a thought.  Why doesn't someone take a process that turns plastic into oil, [such as this](http://www.popsci.com/popsci/flat/bown/2007/innovator_2.html?), drive a ship with a giant net through the trash heap, and produce tons of oil from the tons of trash?
Actually, they seem to have just put in really darn good imagery for that particular place.  Look at it in the full Earth viewer, not the browser Maps view.
Unfortunately the internet has not replaced tv (yet), or at least not for the majority of the voting population.  Who knows, maybe the event that turns all of this armchair activism into take-to-the-streets-with-a-bullhorn activism will be an internet censorship issue.
Yes, it is called the "American" gene. 
While much of the US is indeed very car centric, one doesn't have to live in the middle of a big city to be car-free. Here's a list of smaller places that have a lot of non-car commuters:  http://www.bikesatwork.com/carfree/census-lookup.php?state_select=ALL_STATES&amp;lower_pop=50000&amp;upper_pop=250000&amp;sort_num=4&amp;show_rows=25&amp;first_row=0
Did he not wear a t-shirt with "I'm a bloody fucking Qaedist" printed on the front?
Dude, a 'turd'?  What are you going to call him next, a poo poo head?
Sure, but I've never seen anyone complain when jobs were too plentiful.  They don't say "hey! the employers should band together to prevent us from getting higher pay and benefits thanks to our scarcity and importance!"  If there are too many pilots, for instance, their wages go down, for a real economic reason, which is to discourage people from pursuing that profession relative to others.  Higher wages for professions with greater scarcity gives everyone an incentive to find jobs in more challenging/needed professions.  For example, scarcity in nursing will push up wages, which will attract people from other professions, including, perhaps, flight attendants.  This isn't some nefarious scheme by companies, but macro-level market forces which exist to organize the employment in an efficient way. 
A phenomenon known to men as *beer goggles*.   It can backfire horribly the next morning, by making you wake up next to women you would run away from when sober. 
In reality, he could beat the shit out of you.
Yes, for the right job on the right team.  Passion is perhaps the most important aspect for certain jobs.  Not everyone is a corporate yes-man.  Zed should be a one-man packaged software vendor.
Bloody hell that's the saddest, most depessing comment I've ever read on reddit.   I need a tissue and you need a puppy licking your face right now. 
&gt;If there is a problem with the free market, the libertarians claim it isn't truly free.  &gt;If only we could go back to the 18th Century, when everyone was rich and free.  That's pretty much the biggest non sequitur I've ever seen. The 18th and 19th centuries witnessed the creation of the modern system of industrial corporatism through [state theft of property on a massive scale](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Enclosure). I don't see how claiming that theft "isn't free" is any sort of contradiction.
If you open up a command prompt in XP, you will see that the window decor is the old style, not the XP window theme, Luna.   I thought it was an interesting bit of trivia.
not all, but c'mon down and see how many kids swing by the streetcorners straight outta the suburbs - someone's gotta fund things around here...
I have the flu :(
I think they probably saved money on make up considering if they showed that part of the female body in an American movie it would *have* to be rated NC-17.
So how many countries have you been to? ;)  ( 'countries' not 'counties' )
Create a PuTTY session with your username and setup [key authentication](http://slu.ms/articles/public-key-authentication-with-putty). [Tunnel ports](http://realprogrammers.com/how_to/set_up_an_ssh_tunnel_with_putty.html) (see [SMB-specific instructions](http://www.blisstonia.com/eolson/notes/smboverssh.php)).  Grab plink and create a batch file that runs `plink &lt;yourprofile&gt;`.
No Americans again!  Woo hoo!!
Like I said, the sample was likely biased.
Everyone should see the movie http://www.adaywithoutamexican.com/ I know I will be miss them when they are gone. 
The process of decieving ourselves into believing harmful behavior is harmless
It looks like .Net is becoming the new Cobol in midwest IT shops.
if you cant take it - dont dish it... bing!
I have no problem with his message except for the zionist crap, but he comments is almost every post in caps. His message is a little nonsensical also.  It is the equivalent of wake up sheeple!  I prefer messages that are coherent and well thought out - something that has substance.
I wish I had a NY Times subscription so that I could cancel it in disgust. 
Where's the slap in the face exactly?  They're politely asking fox to include some excluded candidates.
Black is much more sexy, as it's both subtle and alluring. Thigh highs accentuate the thighs and that's certainly good. And, if you get lucky later, your partner will want your thigh highs on - the sensation of the silky fabric makes everything better.  What party are you going to, again? 
When they stop corrupting governments and stop terrorizing universities, ISP's, and individuals, then I'll start buying music again, until then, fuck you corporate music industry!
And to what end are rights a means? There is no law that cannot be corrupted. You have to keep the spirit behind the laws alive.
PBR is ok, although by the 10th one I'm already hungover. As canned beers go: give me a Black Label.
Paul will meet one; not to worry.
so youve never been?  and you think you know?  haha!  Typical...  and btw - I never said i "liked' Texas.  I was just born there on an Army base...my mom said it sucked...you are just confirming that opinion.  haha.
Post a link to pics
Because this is BORING.  Who didn't learn about this freshman or sophomore year?
There are other options for internalizing the externalities of pollution.  One is to give airspace property rights to landowners, like up to 1000 feet over their land or something.  If you can prove that someone is lowering the air quality over your land, you should be able to charge them a fee just like you would charge a fee for dumping trash.  They would have the choice of paying you to pollute or filtering the polluted air before it left their land.  Or, you could take them to court.  It's not a perfect solution, but it would put most of the emphasis on cleaning the air in places where people cared most about clean air, like in densely populated areas, wildlife preserves, parks, farms, and whatnot.  As for education:  1 Why would people not be able to afford an education if there were no government schools?  Bear in mind that free market education would almost certainly offer a variety of alternatives to our current factory-esque one-size-fits-all system.  2 &gt; I'd rather pay than live in a society of illiterate dimwits  Why not both?  ;)
Aw dude, you're not gonna' do that dressing up like a chick thing again *tonight* are you?
HILARIOUS dialogue between some toothless 30%ers and informed impeachment advocates. Check it out!!!
&gt;The Civil Rights Act of 1964 gave the federal government unprecedented power over the hiring, employee relations, and customer service practices of every business in the country. The result was a massive violation of the rights of private property and contract, which are the bedrocks of free society. The federal government has no legitimate authority to infringe on the rights of private property owners to use their property as they please and to form (or not form) contracts with terms mutually agreeable to all parties. The rights of all private property owners, even those whose actions decent people find abhorrent, must be respected if we are to maintain a free society.
&gt; it's scamming  Oh really? Was somebody tricked? Lied to?
It surely is the gonorrhea infested dick of America.
Scratch, and a trust fund.
I used to freak people out by saying stuff like "I am my feet" and "I am blood." ... ... I was such a strange child.
I read this a long time ago, long before I was a Kurt Vonnegut fan, and I loved it.  I didn't even know it was written by him, but in retrospect it makes perfect sense.  Excellent submission no-op.  You get the Orange Arrow of Honor.
I'm from So Cal dude and I now live in Lancaster where many have moved to from your area.   
[From the Wikipedia thingy]: &gt; tumorigenesis is not an evolutionary process.  That reminds me of some old sci-fi short story where a scientist finds the cure for cancer, but ends up being assassinated by a man who can shape shift before he can releases the cure, on the basis that cancer is just the next step of human evolution trying to manifest itself. As it turns out, the shape shifter decides to transform into a bomb. It's like a suicide bomber, but without the suicide. Presumably.  I read that stuff when I was 10 and I have no recollection whatsoever of the title or author.  If anybody remembers what I'm talking about, please let me know.
I'm at home, drunk, feeling like a thousand idiots.
They're following their natural instincts.  something colorful, maybe a little shiny is bobbing in the water, it looks edible.  Maybe it's a fish.  The unfortunate bird swoops down and ingests it, killing him slowly. The problem isn't the natural instincts of birds, or tigers, or what have you.  It's our tendency to think we can do whatever we want to do without any consequences.  Of course, if there are some, it's their fault for being stupid; not ours for polluting their environment, or poking them with a stick. Judging by your post, you are either A. A conservative, or B. 12 years old.  Either way you have much to learn.   I, myself have grown up and am currently a conservative.  What we (assuming you are a conservative) need to do is realize that wanton disregard for the environment is not a conservative principal.  Just because something, such as environmental issues, tend to be a 'liberal' issue, that doesn't mean we should ignore them.  No one party has a monopoly on truth.  The quicker the country learns that simple fact, is the day we step forward rather than backward.  
This is just not right!  Granted the guy must have some talent for balance, but still...ewwww!
That is probably the funniest thing I have ever read on prog.reddit, and I don't know any of the people involved.
It's in the requirements.  Pretty much all of them are Windows-only, and most of them run on older Windows systems as well (I can't check now since the server seems to be down).
Ahh, thank you.  As we say in northern California, that's HeLa cool.
How do you do that?  It is cool!
Sounds like an excellent way to start the new year. Cheers to the both of you!
Gotta love cliques and arrogant pricks.  I suppose you're the kind of guy who hates NASCAR and the people who like it. Or anyone and everyone who listens to rap, or country, or whatever your most detested kind of music is. You lead a sheltered life if you limit your experience to people who think and act like you.  I pity you.
&gt;Every time a govt collapses for a brief period of time free markets get established.   Really? Without a government, what prevents theft? I was under the impression that most government collapses were followed shortly by looting...  A free market is an economic system with voluntary cooperation only: no theft or violence. You might be confusing anarchy with free markets.
Double feature with Bigfoot documentary?
Who was his VP at the time?  Oh wait...
I'm not saying it was their proudest moment, but I would question why you say that the security detail abandoning their posts was "mysterious."  If you recall, when her convoy was attacked when she returned to Pakistan, a whole bunch of her security detail was blown to smithereens.  The new security detail was probably on a hair trigger with nervousness about another attack. As they were right to be.  There's no mystery here. If you are a low-paid security worker or a rank-and-file Pakistani soldier commandeered to be on the security detail, when you see a suicide bombing about to happen, you are going to skedaddle if you have a chance. Or maybe you are assuming qualities for the members of the security detail that they did not have.  That said, I'm not saying Musharraf or the ISI or the CIA or whoever didn't do it. But don't ascribe mystery where there isn't any.
My feelings exactly!
Let me guess:  in real life, you are a 40-plus, hairy, male, closeted Republican legislator?
Better late than never, Bobby baby.
Title should be changed to "My reddit name is contraian and I'm staying home tonight because I have no social life. Vote up if you agree."
DAMN YOU BIG ROCKET SHIP
"high-top fade he word" ???
And a video that shows a gun, but doesn't show a bullet hitting her, proves to you that what the government said was wrong?
Ooohhhh...that would be a great idea.
$100mil ... that's about 4 1/2 hours of war in Iraq isn't it? 
Yes. I believe the single most important benefit will be the introduction of safe bindings to existing libraries that can be shared across multiple language implementations. This way the communities of all languages can work together to get safe bindings up and running and then share them and we could finally have a decent set of libraries available for our favourite languages. This will never happen as long as the work is divided and replicated separately in each language. OpenGL/GLU and GTK+ are excellent examples of this. No functional languages have adequate (e.g. recent, documented with examples and tested working programs) interfaces to these libraries despite their importance. There are other advantages of using LLVM that are specific to technical computing (my remit). Type-specialized code can be JIT compiled to remove the cost of polymorphism (and other abstractions). Floating point arrays (including unboxed ones like complex arrays) can benefit from SSE etc. Hopefully I'll be able to put some serious effort into creating an HLVM for a first-order statically-typed (without complete inference) language with some useful bindings (like OpenGL 2). 
WAKE UP SHEEPLE!
Am I missing something?
NO We're gonna STAY THE COURSE
doesn't matter i read this 2 years ago, plus im 99% sure it's a spoof. 
That sucks.  Do you want my Hanna Montana tickets?
Duplicate.
Japan is different. If a Japanese employee strikes, he puts a note on his desk: "I'M STRIKING", whilst keeping the pace up.
So it goes.
I've just taken to assuming that anybody who invokes Godwin is a Nazi themselves.  Don't want to be thought a Nazi, then don't invoke this stupid "law". 
it's fake the guy would onyl have to ask one computer dork, and he's be informed.
santa cruz????  how things have changed. 
you can go to [flickr](http://www.flickr.com/) and create an account (easy) and upload a picture (also easy). and you will be able to use it in the future.  
Wow!  I get a chance to mod you up!
Clever.  I always wondered whether that was allowed.
They can at Chase but our market-share is getting bigger all the time.
Watch out for topless chicks, whatever you do, don't show them your penis--its a trap!
From Job 1: 20 "Teh Ceiling Cat giv me cheezburger, teh Ceiling Cat takded mah cheezburger awai. I stil laiks teh Ceiling Cat." 21 And teh Ceiling Cat sed "I winz!!" 22 In all dis Job wudn´ do eniting dat made teh Ceiling Cat sad."  Oh my.
Ubuntu's popcon certainly claims several times as many installs than Debian for most packages: http://flyingfrogblog.blogspot.com/2007/11/most-popular-functional-languages-on.html IIRC, the most popular Ubuntu packages have around half a million registered installs. How many Ubuntu installs are there in the world? 
I don't like anything derogatory - it's not about Paul.
These are the jokes, son.  You have to laugh at at least one or I'll get fired.
Yup, I've got my iMac connected GigE to my server with plain old cat5 and it works fine. It is only 3 feet from the server though.
You're right. The website is Kansas City, but the video is from the Houston broadcast. Unexpected.
me too.  I had never made the connection that it was by vonnegut.
Here we go. 0am, Jan 1st here in Brazil
I compiled ledit into vanilla OCaml using the old camlp4 so that I can recompile it with any future version of OCaml. I'm surprised the package maintainer didn't do that (or is it Daniel himself?). 
Sorry that may be the case.  This is a repost that I noticed over on Fark.com.  But the MythBusters did cover the topic, and the quote from the article does describe a "reality TV show" (not a commercial), as evidenced by this episode synopsis:  http://mythbustersresults.com/episode71  Even if it wasn't Mythbusters, it is appears that it is useful knowledge to know.
&gt;*"They were fantasists, narcissists, murderers and criminals..."*   Who are we actually talking about here?  Bush &amp; Co?  Neo-Cons?  NWO?  I see this as one lot of woolly thinking simply exchanged for another.   Until the actual *causes of "terror"* are confessed and dealt with, all the words in the world wont make one iota of difference.
I'm in Oregon. I just got a snail mail from Senator Smith today. "Rest assured that should S. 1959 come before the full Senate for consideration, I will keep your comments in mind." Yeah, I'm resting, particularly since he pointed out that H.R. 1955 passed 404-6. RIP USA.
an impartial panel that will be sponsored by microsoft
One might argue that the change is merely semantic in nature, but metaphors frame the argument. A step in the right direction I wish the we (the USofA) would take. I'm tired of wars.
this is just mean..
Doesn't anyone realize that as the length of a topic goes on, the chances something is compared to anything else (inlcuding Hitler and the Nazis) becomes more certain?
I believed that until this afternoon, when the help desk folks at work were watching [Knocked Up](http://www.imdb.com/title/tt0478311/).  The baby-delivery scene had footage of the baby's head pushing out of the birth canal.  They also dressed the baby up in convincing afterbirth gunk and a prosthetic unbilical cord.  For an American film, I thought it was pretty impressive.
These forces act IN ADDITION to the normal business climate of minimizing costs, sometimes as the expense of the staff, so there is still some blame to be handed around for companies.  The biggest being the shift in employment off shore, for one, and the move to automation for their manufacturing for the other. Both understandable from the company's perspective, too.  Why would you pay people to do what a tireless robot does for much cheaper?  Why would you pay an American when a Chinese person would do it for a pittance? Of course, the social advocate in me says ... because you are human beings and putting people into the edge of slavery simply because they are so desperate for work and money that they will take it is a MASSIVE step backwards for humanity as a whole.  Might as well bring back slavery at that point because they are about as close to slaves as you can get without actually hitting the word itself.  Corporations are made to create profit, but there is a line beyond which their products and services don't outweigh their negative repercussions. Back to the main point ... every person laid off from manufacturing usually ends up in that service sector where there is a glut of workers.  There is honestly only so many knowledge based jobs to go around and there is a significant portion of the population that was never suited for that sort of work to begin with.  The service sector will flood, further driving down wages, and you will have the large portion of your population unable to afford most of the products of your companies. To me, this is all linked to the massive personal debt Americans live under because they are attempting to purchase a lifestyle their parents afforded, but which is out of reach for most of us, now.  No one likes to face up to the fact that the next few generations will be the first to see a decline in their fiscal standing from those who went before.
The truth hurts?
They weren't apes with sticks. 
You're probably thinking of the $10 deal quietly offered up in June... as mentioned in TFA.  This $20 deal apparently began on December 20th.  When I click on the supplied link (titled $19.99 DSL Option) I get the following:  "Due to technical problems, we are unable to process your order online at this time."  Which was the same shit I always got on the $10 deal earlier in the year.  The catch?  At least insofar as the $10 deal, the only way to get it was (is?) online.  No talkee talkee.  It should be amazing to me that a company can get away with such shady shit.  Unfortunately these days very little surprises me at all.
I'll be staying home and working on some websites. Pretty cool eh? I might even get high. Although I got high the last 3 nights. Maybe I should take the night off? ...   also I just donated another $17.76 to Ron Paul. Help him get to $20 Million dudes.
It just looks like the percents are switched between kuicinich and Richardson The numbers are organized from Top to Bottom left to right. As are the percents if you switched Kucinich and Richardson Someone probably just switched up a Code and had the percents go to the wrong Canidate   
I just dont know where any parties are.
&gt;Immigration controls are unjust because they constitute a limitation on the right to work; because they penalise the poorest workers in the world; because they intensify the advantage that (increasingly mobile) capital already has over the labour it exploits; because they rely on the construction of tyrannical powers for the state (the only remaining state with truly effective border controls being North Korea); and because they rely on racist discursive practises with characteristically deadly effects. Immigration controls are not always good for specific sectors of capital - sometimes they face labour shortages because of specific caps on seasonal workers - but as a rule they maintain a flow of labour while keeping it under some level of control, keeping it domesticated and timid with the threat of imminent exposure and expulsion.
They do if they have an inheritance. Who knows?
Never seen hard core bikers? I've seen them french kissing each other. Bearded, tatooed all over and swapping spit. Nasty lot.
The two I considered playing (Mr.Robot and Depth of Peril) are both demos.
It's amateur night with extra cops. I'm not going anywhere.
Rupert Murdoch probably doesn't like to be told what to do...
Ahh Mormonism...I enjoy watching their blatant disregard of my laws yet still claim to follow Christianity. 
DDR and Guitar hero.  Possibly Reefer Hookah... That would be total win.
boy don't you love it when people can't make a point to save their life but love to make cute comments.  I followed your format because I wanted to respond to your comment.  Hence my responses will follow your statements. MLK was a leader but didn't run anything like a business or a political party or a country.  We didn't vote for the same assholes.  No you voted for the other assholes and expected different behavior.  Corruption in the Democratic party is every bit as bad as it is in the GOP, and you talk like the only history you know is Clinton/Bush.  Get an education.  Nixon was worse than Bush and if you go back through the list of crooked presidents, there are a few worse than Nixon. I don't get it how people can honestly believe that voting Democrat is voting to stop corruption.  Get a clue and watch the money train to Washington, it goes to both sides of the aisle.
&amp;gt; quit
Low unionization is very closely correlated with high inequality.   http://robertdfeinman.com/society/wealth_unionization.jpg  I think inequality is bad. Billionaires (and the surprisingly numerous redditors railing against unions here) apparently doesn't. 
Huckabee does not show negative ads. And I am not typing a comment here.
Agreed... that website is terrible. For some odd reason every time I tried to leave the site, it would just reload it.  Can we please not link to news stories that are really video clips? 
Speaks to the intellect and maturity of your average paulturd.
A whiteboard
Down-votes obviously.  Duh!
That's not true. Every comment is mutually exclusive. You can't draw that conclusion. Godwin's law was written as a joke.
business degree and no money or home for 6 months?  haha
And . . . ?
The room then exploded into a cacophony of questioning from the press memorializing this event as a moment that might be remembered as campaign meltdown for Huckabee.
&gt;No one can be a freethinker who demands conformity to a bible, creed, or messiah. To the freethinker, revelation and faith are invalid, and orthodoxy is no guarantee of truth.  Guess they should call it "AlmostFreethinker" or "Freethinkerabouttruththatcomesfromanywherebutrevelationfaith&amp;orthodoxy."
You must really like spam, or really like Windows, or some combination of both.  Ok smart guy, here's your chance to shine...what's your solution?
I am one of those drunk idiots
I think this is what op is talking about http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=HauvaKfcnX0
You know, I was dead set against RP early on, but seeing his interviews and speeches has changed my mind.  He seems to be the only honest man in Presidential politics today, and seems worth electing for that reason alone.  Now, he's the first candidate I suggest to people who don't follow politics. That said, headlines like these remind me why I'm so uncomfortable with him.  "Absolute faith" in anything seems pretty scary.  And his ideas about free markets deserve some scrutiny.  The modern market of corporations is not American, not enshrined in the constitution, and seems to me one of the poisons that is destroying America. This country lives and breathes because of ideas that modern American politics deems socialist, that have no place in a pure free market system.  Consider that the internet was created by a socialist system (publicly funded research) - and we had at least 3 major tries by private entities, all horrible because they were proprietary.  Consider our knowledge of physics and modern biology.  And there are many, many examples like this - we just dont speak about them, or call them socialist.  The end result of a long propaganda campaign by free market idealogues.   And don't free markets require some social infrastructure to exist?  Laws to enforce property rights, a police force that enables a creditor to collect on what society deems he "owns"?  It seems fairly arbitrary to decide that property rights supersede all other social goods.  This is a philosophy which worships at the altar of selfishness and which is tearing up our social fabric.
Vote up if that title made you vomit a little bite in your mouth!
This is wrong on so many levels.  
This guy still gives off the impression of being a cunt.  &gt;We all have our bad days.  &gt;You complaining that "He stopped me for nothin, oterwise he'd have given me a ticket," is crap and, frankly, is the reason most of us have stopped giving warnings.   Excuses, excuses. If you can't be a gentleman all the time you have no place being a policeman. I wouldn't even let you do a retail job. People like that should be in factories where their anti-social nature won't hurt anyone.
&gt;...Ron Paul's critics are right that he doesn't have a shot in hell of winning, and even if he did win by some miracle from god, the establishment would start working from day one to stop him and get him kicked out...  Actually, he'd probably be shot. Only politicians who play ball serve full terms. 
;) I will one day...  yes it does suck cause guys like you live there...guys who think that other places suck - without ever having been to those places....  you can be a redneck -- and you dont even have to live in Texas!
He might have his pistol-toting, dog hanging obese son go southern on someone?
yea that is sick!  LUCAS explains what happened here:  [http://www.lucasarts.com/rumors/generalphallus](http://www.internetisseriousbusiness.com/)
who can remember star wars and not remember General Phallus.
[Sacrelige!](http://www.stallman.org/saint.html)
You don't need the bible for direction. Just follow the directions inscribed on [this holy pendant](http://api.ning.com/files/Uog6XWzejdNOdhb*4tpUTIEf-peEJ2h89btARKKODNo_/Recycle1.jpg), and you'll get to your final destination. It might take a while, but it really works, trust me.
&gt; And that rant just screams constant care and feeding required.  I guess you somehow have to square that conclusion with the fact that other commenters  here have encountered the guy both online and in person, and find him both pleasant and polite *and* possessing a sense of humour.  Hey, you may be right. But you may also be extremely wrong.  Personally, I reckon if this guy has managed to make it into his thirties without someone killing him, he probably has enough maturity/judgement to be diplomatic when necessary. Even if he does enjoy ranting perhaps a little too much :).
my mum is visiting from out of the country and i haven't seen her in over 2 years, so I'm hanging out with her and forsaking all the drunk and stupid bullshit I'd normally end up regretting.  Plus, she wants to see the rose parade tomorrow, so I'm getting up at fucking 5AM so we can get a good spot.  That's what a good daughter I am. 
Wow...you can't even keep your mental masturbation images in one thread, can yah?
GO BACK TO NAZI GERMANY MR BUSH FAN BOI
Twilight Zone Marathon FTW
he's starting to lose support from his fellow mormons over this, now, too.  They view this statement as a betrayal.
Wow.  Classism much?  Edit:  I'm sorry, this one is too funny to let go.  &gt; If you can't be a gentleman all the time you have no place being a policeman. I wouldn't even let you do a retail job. People like that should be in factories where their anti-social nature won't hurt anyone.  So then, by your logic, you should be stuck in a factory somewhere.  You know, because retail is too classy for you.  Because you are clearly not exhibiting gentlemanly behavior right now, **OlympicPirate**, you should be working factory hours with the other anti-social nutsuckers.  According to your own rules.  Do you people even think before you post?  What's your blood pressure like?  Kick any puppies lately?  Didja put any more people in their place?  When we're done with the actors within the police state, what do you think we should do with the blacks and the Jews?
You sound a lot like my cousin. Wait, are you from the Bay Area?
WTF IS THIS SHIT MAN? ARE YOU KIDDING ME?
It's his masturbation.
I reserve my opinions to places Ive been...and I usually dont pan 'places' or 'nations'...  well...I take that back.  Rednecks?  yea they suck...and they can come from almost any nation!  lets change the name of reddit...  Redditneck.com  ;)
SO, I was thinking.  The photo was taken when the two teams were on the goaline.   Maybe it was 4th down, and the cheerleader thought for a second that USC's defense had stopped them.  Therefore, turning the ball over to USC.   Just a thought
THAT PRICE IS GEORGE BUSH
Same here. Although not likely that they're the same person, where did you meet her?
Sadly, a client of mine is throwing some crazy party in Tempe Arizona (not the block party or lake party) I have five VIP tickets and no one wants to go anymore.  Oh well!
They don't need a stupid fancy car. People need a car that moves. When I get my next car, I plan on getting one mad in the past 7 years, and then installing features to it. Cars with built-in extras tend to be overprices.
this is why I love you, lol.  ;)
im having a haouse part in my mcmansion.  i also have a live feed..check it out  [http://www.mcmansionnewyearsparty2008.com](http://www.internetisseriousbusiness.com/)
Christmas Eve is a popular time to go out for KFC in Japan (I'm not making this up).
WOW, LET ME GO OUT IN THE ROAD WITH A FUCKING BULLHORN TO REMIND MY NEINHORS ITS THE LAST FUCKING DAY OF THE RU PAUL MONEY BOMB NO REALLY
Don't click that!!
here here!
They did:  &gt;02:49 &lt; brixen&gt; I'll restore from r1002  That's not the issue. Rather, kevinclark not only decided "oh, let's delete a file from the repository" without thinking about whether it might be essential; he also didn't let anyone know. I.e., the deletion occurred without any peer review. Are project maintainers supposed to continuously watch commits of those they trust enough to have commit privileges?
Fergus Cullen is now big friend of Dr. Paul:   Some experts say polls may be undercounting Paul's support, because so many of his backers haven't voted in the past and use cellphones rather than the landlines, which pollsters use. That's why Paul "is likely to do better on election day than polls say he might," said Fergus Cullen, chairman of the New Hampshire Republican Party in an interview for C-SPAN's "Newsmakers" on Sunday.
&gt;This is pandering to the worst, Tom Tancredo-esque paranoia and outright ignorance (or do I repeat myself?) and is not worthy of Dr. Paul. I have the utmost respect for the candidate, but in using this unfortunate term, “terrorist nations,” the Good Doctor undermines his non-interventionist foreign policy stance. If these are, in truth, “terrorist nations” – which most will take to mean all predominantly Muslim nations — then why not invade them, kill the terrorists, and be done with it? This phraseology gives the War Party carte blanche – and, believe you me, they’ll use it.
WHERE THE PICS AT BITCH
whaaattteevverrrr,,,, they're all bible thumpers as far as I'm concerned
The systems that require users to know about stuff like sudo are the problem.
A link to the actual image:  http://www.csdp.org/publicservice/coleman.jpg
Explain how not--the better you do (excellence), the higher a percentage they take.
Werner Herzog made a documentary, Bells from the Deep, about strange cults in Russia. From http://rogerebert.suntimes.com/apps/pbcs.dll/article?AID=/20071117/PEOPLE/71117002 &gt; ... There were the people who lived near a deep lake, and believed that on its bottom there was a city populated by angels. To see it, they had to wait until winter when the water was crystal clear, and then creep spread-eagled onto the ice. If the ice was too thick, they could not see well enough. Too thin, and they might drown.   He says he made it all up, but it could be from some folk legend based on this civilization...
sorry i fixed the link
HDMI/DVI uses differential signaling called TMDS - http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/TMDS
I only hope someone takes up Mongrel. I love Open Source, for this reason.
Oh please, redditors are far too smart to fall for such a crazy trick.
We'd be cheering on the person who would gladly get arrested for the cause.
Make it yourself. I do.
I actually meant [the fee that Universal Music gets for every Zune sold](http://www.engadget.com/2006/11/09/universal-music-get-fee-for-every-zune-sold/).  However, that story looks even more frightening. Good thing it got dismissed.
How can you legally exclude a presidential candidate from running because you don't like him. Isn't that what voting and democracy are for? 
Good answer.
I personally like these better: http://www.9mmsfx.com/lenses.html  Or this  http://www.fxeyes.com/custom_lenses.html  Too bad they are so pricey, otherwise I'd be buying those all the time
If the astrologers are right then this RHINO might be the next person in the Oval Office. Dem predictions are up tomorrow.
Ah. More straw men. This conversation is nearly at an end. 1) the assumption that small organisations wanting or not wanting to be bought will make any difference to the de-democratising effects of consolidation. 2) the assumptions that people owning companies actually don't want to be bought in significant numbers so as not to make a difference. 3) the assumption that a big company can't effectivly force a sale by destroying a smaller companies operating environment or creating a cash-flow crisis. I don't think you understand what a "sale" often entails in this context. It's not someone turning up with a chequebook and buying a company and then driving away with the office keys... it tends to be a process of "loans", combined with buying of smaller equity stakes, the shouldering of liabilities - with strings attached... which over time increase the leverage that the bigger company has over you.  So. One of my companies (not both, one... the one that happens to own a massive database of sports information) has been subject to more or less constant manouvering by "partner" companies who tried to push us into a cash-flow crisis, then "save the day" by buying a stake that would give them control. That is not a philisophical context and the use of the term "proof" doesn't exactly inspire confidence in your grasp of logic. So on those grounds and the intimation that I'm lieing... conversation over.
**ignore this facist scum**
I have no stats to back this up, but I have a feeling the majority of these idiots taking loans to buy piles of shit like Fords which depreciate like a rock. I live in CA where everyone owns Accords and Camrys and they're paid off.
He shouldn't be in a factory because it is a 'low' job. He should be in a factory because it is a job which requires no social skills, which this man obviously lacks. He could also be a programmer, a writer or a construction worker... but all those jobs require skills which he probably doesn't have.
Or get an upstream maintainer to trojan a very basic package that executes with root privileges. `libncurses` for instance would be something that is likely to be executed with root privileges, but that isn't likely to be scrutinised even by the most security conscious.  And then have it do something along the lines of(pseudocode):  if ((uid == 0) &amp;&amp; (rand(1000)==69)) { download_the_bad_stuff_n_root_this_box(); }
